Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1505.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "eligible provider" in section 20250HB1505PN3764 - 2 - <--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031323334353637383940414243444546474849 1511-D of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1511-D. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Eligible provider." Any of the following entities if the entity complies with all quality program standards established by the Department of Education:(1) A school district.(1.1) An intermediate unit.(2) A Head Start program.(3) A nursery school licensed under the act of January 28, 1988 (P.L.24, No.11), known as the Private Academic Schools Act.(4) One of the following:(i) Prior to July 1, 2009, a child day care center or a group day care home that has met or exceeded the standards of STAR 2 under the Keystone STARS quality rating system established by the Department of Public Welfare.(ii) After June 30, 2009, a child day care center or a group day care home that has met or exceeded the standards of STAR 3 under the Keystone STARS quality rating system established by the Department of Public Welfare. Any approved provider under this subparagraph which has applied for a STAR 3 rating and which application has not been approved or rejected by the department as of June 30, 2009, shall remain eligible for 20250HB1505PN3764 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the program until such application is rejected.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.SECTION 1. THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), KNOWN AS THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949, IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 121.2. STANDARDIZED TESTING STUDY.--(A) THE COMMITTEE SHALL CONDUCT A COMPREHENSIVE STUDY ON STANDARDIZED TESTS AND ACCOUNTABILITY REQUIREMENTS OF THE ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION ACT OF 1965 (PUBLIC LAW 89-10, 20 U.S.C. § 6301 ET SEQ.), AS AMENDED BY THE EVERY STUDENT SUCCEEDS ACT (PUBLIC LAW 114-95, 129 STAT. 1802).(B) THE COMMITTEE SHALL SUBMIT, NO LATER THAN JUNE 9, 2027, A REPORT CONTAINING THE RESULTS OF THE STUDY TO THE GOVERNOR, THE SECRETARY OF EDUCATION, THE CHAIRPERSON OF THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION, THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE EDUCATION COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE AND THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE EDUCATION COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES. THE STUDY SHALL BE POSTED ON THE COMMITTEE'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE. THE STUDY SHALL INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING:(1) HOW THE COMMONWEALTH'S USE OF STANDARDIZED TESTS COMPLIES WITH REQUIREMENTS OF THE ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION ACT OF 1965, AS AMENDED BY THE EVERY STUDENT SUCCEEDS ACT, INCLUDING A REVIEW OF PARTICIPATION AND OPT-OUT RATES DISAGGREGATED BY EACH SCHOOL ENTITY.(2) A REVIEW OF THE TYPE OF ASSESSMENTS USED BY ALL OTHER STATES TO COMPLY WITH THE ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION ACT OF 1965, AS AMENDED BY THE EVERY STUDENT SUCCEEDS ACT.(3) A SUMMARY OF ADMINISTRATIVE CHANGES TO THE 20250HB1505PN3764 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 COMMONWEALTH'S ASSESSMENT SYSTEM AND IMPLEMENTED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION BETWEEN THE 2014-2015 AND 2025-2026 SCHOOL YEARS, INCLUDING THE REDUCTION IN THE AMOUNT OF TIME DEDICATED TO FEDERALLY REQUIRED ASSESSMENTS AND IF TESTING TIME COULD BE REDUCED FURTHER WITHOUT JEOPARDIZING VALIDITY OF TESTING RESULTS.(4) THE AMOUNT OF TIME NECESSARY TO ADMINISTER STANDARDIZED TESTS EACH YEAR, DISAGGREGATED BY TYPE OF EXAM AND SCHOOL ENTITY, AND A COMPARISON TO THE AMOUNT OF TIME DEDICATED TO ACCOUNTABILITY ASSESSMENTS IN OTHER STATES.(5) THE TOTAL ANNUAL COST TO THE COMMONWEALTH AND SCHOOL ENTITIES TO ADMINISTER STANDARDIZED TESTS EACH YEAR FROM THE 2014-2015 THROUGH 2025-2026 SCHOOL YEARS, INCLUDING THE COST INCURRED BY STUDENTS TO PARTICIPATE, DISAGGREGATED BY TYPE OF EXAM AND SCHOOL ENTITY.(6) AN ANALYSIS OF THE COMMONWEALTH'S STUDENTS' PARTICIPATION IN STANDARDIZED TESTS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH, DISAGGREGATED BY TYPE OF EXAM AND SCHOOL ENTITY.(7) A REVIEW OF THE TOTAL COST BY STATE TO ADMINISTER HIGHER EDUCATION ASSESSMENTS IN STATES THAT USE ONE FOR PURPOSES OF COMPLIANCE WITH THE TESTING AND ACCOUNTABILITY REQUIREMENTS OF THE ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION ACT OF 1965, AS AMENDED BY THE EVERY STUDENT SUCCEEDS ACT. THE EXAMINATION SHALL INCLUDE AN ANALYSIS OF ANNUAL COSTS INCURRED BY STATES AND HOW COSTS HAVE CHANGED FROM THE 2014-2015 THROUGH 2025-2026 SCHOOL YEARS.(8) AN EVALUATION OF TESTING ACCOMMODATIONS FOR STANDARDIZED TESTS AND HIGHER EDUCATION ASSESSMENTS THAT PERMIT STUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES, ENGLISH LEARNERS AND STUDENTS WHO QUALIFY FOR FREE AND REDUCED LUNCH THE OPPORTUNITY TO PARTICIPATE IN EACH ASSESSMENT AND RECEIVE COMPARABLE BENEFITS.20250HB1505PN3764 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (9) A SUMMARY OF HOW ANY CHANGES TO STANDARDIZED TESTS OR USE OF A DIFFERENT ASSESSMENT WOULD IMPACT THE EDUCATOR EVALUATION SYSTEM, THE FUTURE READY INDEX, THE CALCULATION OF ACADEMIC GROWTH VIA THE VALUE-ADDED ASSESSMENT SYSTEM AND STATEWIDE GRADUATION REQUIREMENTS OR PATHWAYS.(10) A SURVEY OF HOW SCHOOL ENTITIES PREPARE STUDENTS FOR THE STANDARDIZED TESTS, WHICH MAY INCLUDE PRACTICE TESTS, CONSTRUCTIVE RESPONSE PRACTICE, A STRUCTURE FOR INTERVENTION BASED ON PRACTICE TEST RESULTS, SCHOOL DAY SCHEDULE CHANGES FOR TESTED AND NONTESTED STUDENTS, TEST DAY STRATEGIES, A STRUCTURE FOR REMEDIATION IF STUDENTS NEED TO RETEST, VERIFICATION OF CURRICULUM ALIGNMENT AND IF LOCAL END-OF-COURSE ASSESSMENTS ARE ADMINISTERED IN ADDITION TO THE STANDARDIZED TESTS IN ASSOCIATED SUBJECT AREAS.(11) A SURVEY OF EDUCATORS AND SCHOOL TECHNOLOGY ADMINISTRATORS WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH ON THE USE OF ONLINE ASSESSMENTS VERSUS PAPER AND PENCIL EXAMS THAT WILL REFLECT THEIR PROFESSIONAL FEEDBACK ON ONLINE ASSESSMENTS, BENEFITS AND CONCERNS.(12) A SUMMARY AND COMPARISON OF THE EXISTING RESEARCH ON THE CORRELATION BETWEEN PERFORMANCE ON HIGHER EDUCATION ASSESSMENTS AND PERFORMANCE ON STATE STANDARDIZED TESTING.(13) AN ANALYSIS OF THE EFFECTIVENESS OF HIGHER EDUCATION ASSESSMENTS FOR PURPOSES OF AGGREGATE STUDENT COMPARISON AND DIFFERENTIATION AMONG SCHOOLS WITHIN THE COMMONWEALTH'S ACCOUNTABILITY SYSTEM.(14) AN EVALUATION TO DETERMINE WHETHER EACH HIGHER EDUCATION ASSESSMENT MEETS OR MUST MEET THE CRITERIA FOR TECHNICAL QUALITY AND PEER REVIEW.(15) AN EVALUATION OF THE IMPACT OF CHANGES TO THE 20250HB1505PN3764 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 COMMONWEALTH'S TESTING REQUIREMENTS ON THE ALTERNATIVE GRADUATION PATHWAYS IN SECTION 121.(16) A COMPARISON OF THE COST TO THE COMMONWEALTH TO ADMINISTER THE KEYSTONE EXAMS COMPARED TO AN ESTIMATE OF THE COST TO THE COMMONWEALTH TO ADMINISTER A HIGHER EDUCATION ASSESSMENT AS A REPLACEMENT TO THE KEYSTONE EXAMS.(C) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"ACT." AS THE TERM IS DEFINED IN SECTION 121(D)."ADVANCED PLACEMENT PROGRAM." AS THE TERM IS DEFINED IN SECTION 121(D)."COMMITTEE." THE LEGISLATIVE BUDGET AND FINANCE COMMITTEE."HIGHER EDUCATION ASSESSMENT." ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) SAT.(2) ACT.(3) AN EXAM FOR AN ADVANCED PLACEMENT PROGRAM."KEYSTONE EXAM." AS THE TERM IS DEFINED IN SECTION 102."PSSA TEST." AS THE TERM IS DEFINED IN SECTION 102."SAT." AS THE TERM IS DEFINED IN SECTION 121(D)."SCHOOL ENTITY." AS THE TERM IS DEFINED IN SECTION 121(D)."STANDARDIZED TEST." ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) KEYSTONE EXAM.(2) PENNSYLVANIA SYSTEM SCHOOL ASSESSMENT TEST OR PSSA TEST.(3) PENNSYLVANIA ALTERNATE SYSTEM OF ASSESSMENT.SECTION 2. SECTION 742 OF THE ACT IS REPEALED:[SECTION 742. LEAD TESTING.--(A) BEGINNING IN THE 2018-2019 SCHOOL YEAR, AND EVERY SCHOOL YEAR THEREAFTER, SCHOOL FACILITIES WHERE CHILDREN ATTEND SCHOOL MAY BE TESTED FOR LEAD LEVELS IN THE DRINKING WATER AND ANY SCHOOL FACILITY WHOSE TESTING SHOWS 20250HB1505PN3764 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 LEAD LEVELS IN EXCESS OF THE MAXIMUM CONTAMINANT LEVEL GOAL OR MILLIGRAMS PER LITER AS SET BY THE UNITED STATES ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY'S NATIONAL PRIMARY DRINKING WATER REGULATIONS SHALL IMMEDIATELY IMPLEMENT A PLAN TO ENSURE NO CHILD OR ADULT IS EXPOSED TO LEAD CONTAMINATION DRINKING WATER AND THAT ALTERNATIVE SOURCES OF DRINKING WATER ARE MADE AVAILABLE.(B) IF A SCHOOL ENTITY DOES NOT TEST LEAD LEVELS UNDER PARAGRAPH (A) THE SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL, AT A PUBLIC MEETING, DISCUSS LEAD ISSUES IN THE SCHOOL FACILITIES.(C) IF A TEST OF LEAD LEVELS UNDER SUBSECTION (A) IS ELEVATED, THE LEVEL SHALL BE REPORTED TO THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND POSTED ON THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE.]SECTION 2.1. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 742.1. LEAD TESTING.--(A) BEGINNING IN THE 2026-2027 SCHOOL YEAR AND EVERY SCHOOL YEAR THEREAFTER, SCHOOL FACILITIES WHERE CHILDREN ATTEND SCHOOL MAY BE TESTED FOR LEAD LEVELS IN THE DRINKING WATER AND ANY SCHOOL FACILITY WHOSE TESTING SHOWS LEAD LEVELS IN EXCESS OF 0.005 MILLIGRAMS PER LITER SHALL IMMEDIATELY IMPLEMENT A PLAN TO ENSURE THAT NO CHILD OR ADULT IS EXPOSED TO LEAD CONTAMINATION DRINKING WATER AND THAT ALTERNATIVE SOURCES OF DRINKING WATER ARE MADE AVAILABLE.(B) IF A SCHOOL ENTITY DOES NOT TEST LEAD LEVELS UNDER SUBSECTION (A), THE SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL, AT A PUBLIC MEETING, DISCUSS LEAD ISSUES IN THE SCHOOL FACILITIES.(C) IF A TEST OF LEAD LEVELS UNDER SUBSECTION (A) IS ELEVATED, THE LEVEL SHALL BE REPORTED TO THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND POSTED ON THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE.SECTION 3. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING AN ARTICLE TO READ:20250HB1505PN3764 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ARTICLE VII-ASCHOOL FACILITIESSECTION 701-A. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS ARTICLE SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"ATHLETIC FACILITY." A LOCKER ROOM, GYMNASIUM, ARENA, POOL, ATHLETIC TRAINING ROOM, WEIGHT ROOM OR ANY OTHER LOCATION USED BY STUDENTS AND THEIR COACHES FOR SPORTS TRAINING, PRACTICE, COMPETITION AND COACHING."DEPARTMENT." THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OF THE COMMONWEALTH."PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITY." A STRUCTURE, BUILDING OR FACILITY OCCUPIED BY OWNERSHIP, LEASE OR OTHER AGREEMENT AND USED BY A SCHOOL ENTITY."SCHOOL ENTITY." A SCHOOL DISTRICT, AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL, INTERMEDIATE UNIT, CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL, CHARTER SCHOOL OR REGIONAL CHARTER SCHOOL.SECTION 702-A. PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITY INVENTORY.(A) DUTY OF DEPARTMENT.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COLLECT THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION FROM EACH SCHOOL ENTITY FOR EACH PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITY:(1) THE NAME OF THE SCHOOL ENTITY THAT OCCUPIES THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITY THROUGH OWNERSHIP, LEASE OR OTHER AGREEMENT.(2) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITY.(3) THE GRADES SERVED IN THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITY, IF APPLICABLE.(4) THE NUMBER OF STUDENTS ENROLLED IN THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITY AND A PROJECTION FOR STUDENT ENROLLMENT GROWTH OVER 20250HB1505PN3764 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 10 YEARS, IF APPLICABLE.(5) THE BUILDING CAPACITY LIMITS AS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY.(6) WHETHER THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITY IS AN ADMINISTRATIVE BUILDING, INSTRUCTIONAL BUILDING, ATHLETIC FACILITY OR MAINTENANCE BUILDING.(7) THE NUMBER OF STORIES IN THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITY.(8) THE SIZE OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITY IN APPROXIMATE SQUARE FOOTAGE.(9) THE ACREAGE OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITY SITE, IF AVAILABLE.(10) WHETHER THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITY IS:(I) OWNED BY THE SCHOOL ENTITY; OR(II) LEASED OR RENTED TO THE SCHOOL ENTITY, INCLUDING WHETHER THE SCHOOL ENTITY IS FINANCIALLY RESPONSIBLE FOR ROUTINE AND PREVENTATIVE PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITY MAINTENANCE COSTS.(11) THE AGE OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITY, IF KNOWN, INCLUDING DATES AND BRIEF DESCRIPTIONS OF ANY MAJOR RENOVATION OR ADDITION. THIS REQUIREMENT MAY BE MET BY INCLUDING A THIRD-PARTY FACILITY STUDY PREVIOUSLY COMPLETED BY THE SCHOOL ENTITY.(B) DATA SUBMISSION.--NO LATER THAN APRIL 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A FORM AND ELECTRONIC PROCESS FOR A SCHOOL ENTITY TO SUBMIT THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A).(C) DUTY OF SCHOOL ENTITY.--NO LATER THAN DECEMBER 31, 2027, A SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL SUBMIT THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) TO THE DEPARTMENT IN A FORM AND MANNER DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT.20250HB1505PN3764 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) INVENTORY UPDATE.--EVERY FIVE YEARS FROM THE REQUIRED SUBMISSION DATE IN SUBSECTION (C), A SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL REVIEW, UPDATE AND REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT THE INFORMATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A), INCLUDING SUBSTANTIAL CHANGES IN PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITY USE, OCCUPANCY OR OWNERSHIP OR DAMAGE TO OR CLOSURE OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITY.SECTION 4. SECTION 1202.1(B)(2) AND (C) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 1202.1. SPECIAL EDUCATION CERTIFICATE GRADE SPANS AND AGE LEVELS AND DUTIES OF DEPARTMENT.--* * *(B) THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING DUTIES:* * *(2) BY [MARCH 1, 2019, AND BY MARCH 1] DECEMBER 1, 2027, AND BY DECEMBER 1 OF EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, ISSUE A REPORT TO THE EDUCATION COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE, THE EDUCATION COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES AND THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION AND POST THE REPORT ON THE PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE OF THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION THAT INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING:(I) THE NUMBER OF INSTRUCTIONAL I CERTIFICATES ISSUED, IN TOTAL AND SUBDIVIDED BY FIELD OF CERTIFICATION AND TEACHER PREPARATION PROGRAM FOR EACH YEAR BEGINNING IN 2010. THIS SHALL INCLUDE CERTIFICATES ISSUED RECIPROCALLY FOR OUT-OF-STATE TEACHER PREPARATION PROGRAMS.(II) THE NUMBER OF INSTRUCTIONAL II CERTIFICATES ISSUED, IN TOTAL AND SUBDIVIDED BY FIELD OF CERTIFICATION AND TEACHER PREPARATION PROGRAM FOR EACH YEAR BEGINNING IN 2010. THIS SHALL INCLUDE CERTIFICATES ISSUED RECIPROCALLY FOR OUT-OF-STATE TEACHER PREPARATION PROGRAMS.(III) THE NUMBER OF ADMINISTRATIVE CERTIFICATES ISSUED, IN 20250HB1505PN3764 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TOTAL AND SUBDIVIDED BY FIELD OF CERTIFICATION AND TEACHER PREPARATION PROGRAM FOR EACH YEAR BEGINNING IN 2010. THIS SHALL INCLUDE CERTIFICATES ISSUED RECIPROCALLY FOR OUT-OF-STATE TEACHER PREPARATION PROGRAMS.(IV) THE NUMBER OF EMERGENCY CERTIFICATES ISSUED, IN TOTAL AND SUBDIVIDED BY THE LOCAL EDUCATION AGENCY BY WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL IS EMPLOYED AND BY FIELD OF CERTIFICATION FOR EACH YEAR BEGINNING IN 2010.(V) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS WHO HAVE TAKEN THE ASSESSMENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) AND WHO ATTAINED QUALIFYING SCORES ON THE ASSESSMENT SINCE THE ASSESSMENT WAS MADE AVAILABLE BY THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION.(VI) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS WHO SERVED AS CLASSROOM MONITORS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 1218.2 AND THE NUMBER OF DAYS THAT THE SCHOOL ENTITY USED THE SERVICES OF CLASSROOM MONITORS.[(C) THE JOINT STATE GOVERNMENT COMMISSION SHALL CONDUCT A STUDY AND ISSUE A REPORT SUBJECT TO THE FOLLOWING:(1) THE STUDY SHALL ANALYZE THE FOLLOWING:(I) THE APPROPRIATENESS OF THE FIELDS OF CERTIFICATION, INCLUDING GRADE SPAN AND AGE LEVEL LIMITATIONS, IN IMPROVING STUDENT OUTCOMES.(II) THE CREATION OR ELIMINATION OF TEACHING CERTIFICATIONS OR ENDORSEMENTS.(III) NATIONAL TRENDS REGARDING GRADE SPAN AND AGE LIMITATIONS OF CERTIFICATION.(2) THE REPORT SHALL BE TRANSMITTED NO LATER THAN JUNE 1, 2019, TO THE FOLLOWING:(I) THE GOVERNOR.(II) THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE 20250HB1505PN3764 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 EDUCATION COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE.(III) THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE EDUCATION COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.]SECTION 5. SECTION 1205.2(H.1), (N.1) AND (O) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED AND SUBSECTION (C) IS AMENDED BY ADDING A CLAUSE TO READ:SECTION 1205.2. PROGRAM OF CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL AND PARAPROFESSIONAL EDUCATION.--* * *(C) THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (A) MAY BE SATISFIED BY A PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR, WHETHER OR NOT PRESENTLY EMPLOYED BY A SCHOOL ENTITY, BY THE SUCCESSFUL COMPLETION OF CREDITS OR HOURS TO INCLUDE ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:* * *(9) CREDITS OR HOURS APPROVED BY ANOTHER STATE COMPLETED BY A PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR WHO IS CERTIFIED AND EMPLOYED IN A STATE OTHER THAN THIS COMMONWEALTH. THE DEPARTMENT MAY REJECT CREDITS SUBMITTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS PARAGRAPH THAT THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES ARE NOT COMPARABLE TO CREDITS OR HOURS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.* * *(H.1) WHENEVER A PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR MOVES FROM THE ADDRESS NAMED IN THE APPLICATION FOR STATE CERTIFICATION OR FROM THE PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR'S CURRENT ADDRESS, SUCH PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR SHALL NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT AND PROVIDE THE DEPARTMENT WITH THE MOST CURRENT ADDRESS. NOTIFICATION SHALL BE MADE IN A FORM AND MANNER DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT. IF A PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR NOTIFIES THE DEPARTMENT, IN A MANNER DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT, THAT THE PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR HAS MOVED TO A STATE OTHER THAN THIS COMMONWEALTH, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOTIFY THE PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR OF THE ABILITY TO MAINTAIN AN ACTIVE 20250HB1505PN3764 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CERTIFICATE AS ALLOWED BY SUBSECTION (C)(9).* * *[(N.1) (1) BEGINNING ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTIONS (A) AND (F) SHALL BE SUSPENDED UNTIL JUNE 30, 2013. DURING THAT TIME, THE LEGISLATIVE BUDGET AND FINANCE COMMITTEE SHALL CONDUCT A STUDY OF THE COSTS AND BENEFITS OF THE CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAM. AN INTERIM REPORT SHALL BE DUE ON NOVEMBER 30, 2012, AND THE FINAL REPORT SHALL BE DUE ON MARCH 1, 2013. ON JULY 1, 2013, EACH PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR SHALL HAVE THE SAME NUMBER OF HOURS OF CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL EDUCATION AND THE SAME AMOUNT OF TIME IN WHICH TO COMPLETE THOSE HOURS AS EXISTED FOR THE PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, THAT ANY CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL EDUCATION CREDITS OR HOURS COMPLETED BY A PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR DURING THE PERIOD OF SUSPENSION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE CREDITED TO THE PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR'S CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL EDUCATION RECORD.(2) NOTWITHSTANDING THIS SUBSECTION, THE PROVISIONS OF SECTIONS 1003(A)(3) AND (C) AND 1207.1(D)(1)(IV) REQUIRING THAT CANDIDATES FOR APPOINTMENT AS A DISTRICT SUPERINTENDENT OR ASSISTANT DISTRICT SUPERINTENDENT AND CANDIDATES FOR ADMINISTRATIVE AND CAREER AND TECHNICAL DIRECTOR CERTIFICATES COMPLETE A LEADERSHIP DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM THAT MEETS THE PENNSYLVANIA SCHOOL LEADERSHIP STANDARDS UNDER SECTION 1217 SHALL NOT BE SUSPENDED.]* * *(O) DEFINITIONS.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION:20250HB1505PN3764 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "APPROVED PROVIDER" IS AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION, SCHOOL ENTITY, INDIVIDUAL, CORPORATION, PARTNERSHIP, LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY OR ASSOCIATION APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO PROVIDE CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL EDUCATION CREDITS OR HOURS UNDER THIS SECTION. PROVIDED, A SCHOOL ENTITY MAY APPROVE A PROVIDER OF CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL EDUCATION CREDITS OR HOURS IN ACCORDANCE WITH DEPARTMENT GUIDELINES."AREA OF A PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR'S ASSIGNMENT OR CERTIFICATION" SHALL MEAN ANY COMPONENT OF THE EDUCATION PROFESSION AS IT RELATES TO THE CURRENT JOB TITLE OR DESCRIPTION OF THE PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR OR TO ANY AREA OF CERTIFICATION LISTED ON THE PROFESSIONAL EMPLOYE'S PENNSYLVANIA CERTIFICATION OR TO THE TYPE OF CERTIFICATE OR ENDORSEMENT HELD BY THE PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR."COLLEGIATE STUDIES" SHALL MEAN A FORMAL PROGRAM OR COURSE OF STUDY AT AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION LEADING TO THE AWARD OF ACADEMIC CREDIT."COMPLIANCE PERIOD" SHALL MEAN THE PERIOD OF TIME IN WHICH A PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR MUST SATISFACTORILY COMPLETE CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL EDUCATION AS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) AND WHICH CONCLUDES EVERY FIVE YEARS BEGINNING:(1) JULY 1, 2000, FOR THOSE PROFESSIONAL EDUCATORS WHO WERE ISSUED A STATE CERTIFICATE PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2000; OR(2) ON THE DATE ON WHICH THE PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR IS ISSUED A STATE CERTIFICATE FOR THOSE PROFESSIONAL EDUCATORS WHO WERE CERTIFIED AFTER JULY 1, 2000."CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL EDUCATION COURSES" SHALL MEAN COURSES FOR CREDIT, OTHER THAN COLLEGIATE STUDIES, CONDUCTED BY PROVIDERS APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT."DEPARTMENT" SHALL MEAN THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OF THE 20250HB1505PN3764 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 COMMONWEALTH."PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR" SHALL MEAN AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HOLDS A PENNSYLVANIA TEACHER, EDUCATIONAL SPECIALIST OR ADMINISTRATIVE CERTIFICATION [OR], LETTER OF ELIGIBILITY OR COMMISSION QUALIFICATION LETTER ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER SECTION 1003(B.2)."SCHOOL ENTITY" SHALL MEAN A SCHOOL DISTRICT, AN INTERMEDIATE UNIT, A JOINT SCHOOL DISTRICT, AN AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL, A CHARTER SCHOOL AND THE SCRANTON SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF OR ANY OF THESE ACTING JOINTLY.SECTION 6. SECTIONS 1205.5(A)(1), (G) AND (H) AND 1217(C) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 1205.5. CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL EDUCATION FOR SCHOOL OR SYSTEM LEADERS.--(A) (1) [BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2008, EVERY] EVERY SCHOOL OR SYSTEM LEADER SHALL MEET THE CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION 1205.2 THROUGH PARTICIPATION IN PROGRAMS APPROVED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.* * *(G) FOR THE PURPOSE OF THIS SECTION, THE TERM "SCHOOL OR SYSTEM LEADER" SHALL MEAN AN INDIVIDUAL WHO SERVES ON A CERTIFICATE AS A PRINCIPAL, VICE PRINCIPAL, ASSISTANT PRINCIPAL, DIRECTOR OR ASSISTANT DIRECTOR OF AN AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL, SUPERINTENDENT, ASSISTANT SUPERINTENDENT, INTERMEDIATE UNIT EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR[,] OR ASSISTANT INTERMEDIATE UNIT EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR [OR DIRECTOR OF AN AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL.], INCLUDING THOSE SERVING ON A COMMISSION QUALIFICATION LETTER ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION PURSUANT TO SECTION 1003(B.2).[(H) (1) BEGINNING ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS 20250HB1505PN3764 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SUBSECTION, THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTIONS (A), (C) AND (D) SHALL BE SUSPENDED UNTIL JUNE 30, 2013.(2) NOTWITHSTANDING THIS SUBSECTION, THE PROVISIONS OF SECTIONS 1003(A)(3) AND (C) AND 1207.1(D)(1)(IV) REQUIRING THAT CANDIDATES FOR APPOINTMENT AS A DISTRICT SUPERINTENDENT OR ASSISTANT DISTRICT SUPERINTENDENT AND CANDIDATES FOR ADMINISTRATIVE AND CAREER AND TECHNICAL DIRECTOR CERTIFICATES COMPLETE A LEADERSHIP DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM THAT MEETS THE PENNSYLVANIA SCHOOL LEADERSHIP STANDARDS UNDER SECTION 1217 SHALL NOT BE SUSPENDED.]SECTION 1217. PENNSYLVANIA SCHOOL LEADERSHIP STANDARDS.--* * *(C) FOR THE PURPOSE OF THIS SECTION, THE TERM "SCHOOL OR SYSTEM LEADER" SHALL MEAN AN INDIVIDUAL WHO SERVES ON A CERTIFICATE AS A PRINCIPAL, VICE PRINCIPAL, ASSISTANT PRINCIPAL, DIRECTOR OR ASSISTANT DIRECTOR OF AN AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL, SUPERINTENDENT, ASSISTANT SUPERINTENDENT, INTERMEDIATE UNIT EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR[,] OR ASSISTANT INTERMEDIATE UNIT EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR [OR DIRECTOR OF AN AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL.], WHICH INCLUDES THOSE SERVING ON A COMMISSION QUALIFICATION LETTER ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION PURSUANT TO SECTION 1003(B.2).SECTION 7. SECTION 1218.1 OF THE ACT IS REPEALED:[SECTION 1218.1. PERMIT FOR CLASSROOM MONITORS.--(A) A SCHOOL ENTITY MAY REQUEST THAT THE DEPARTMENT ISSUE A CLASSROOM MONITOR PERMIT TO ALLOW AN INDIVIDUAL TO DELIVER TO STUDENTS ASSIGNMENTS THAT ARE PREPLANNED BY A PROFESSIONAL EMPLOYE OR TEMPORARY PROFESSIONAL EMPLOYE. A CLASSROOM MONITOR MAY NOT PLAN LESSONS OR CREATE OR GRADE STUDENT WORK.(B) AN INDIVIDUAL RECEIVING A PERMIT UNDER SUBSECTION (A) 20250HB1505PN3764 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SHALL SATISFY ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) HAS COMPLETED AT LEAST SIXTY (60) SEMESTER HOURS OR THE EQUIVALENT OF COURSES AT A COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY LOCATED IN THIS COMMONWEALTH AND ACCREDITED BY A REGIONAL ACCREDITING AGENCY OR HAS AT LEAST THREE (3) YEARS' EXPERIENCE AS A PARAPROFESSIONAL IN A SCHOOL ENTITY AND IS CURRENTLY EMPLOYED AS A PARAPROFESSIONAL IN A SCHOOL ENTITY.(2) HAS MET THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SECTIONS 111, 111.1 AND 1109(A) AND 23 PA.C.S. CH. 63 SUBCH. C (RELATING TO POWERS AND DUTIES OF DEPARTMENT).(3) HAS ATTAINED A MINIMUM AGE OF TWENTY-FIVE (25) YEARS.(4) HAS COMPLETED TRAINING ON CLASSROOM MANAGEMENT PROVIDED BY AN INTERMEDIATE UNIT AND APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT.(C) AN INDIVIDUAL RECEIVING A PERMIT UNDER THIS SECTION WHO IS ALREADY EMPLOYED BY THE SCHOOL ENTITY AS A PARAPROFESSIONAL SHALL RECEIVE THE HIGHER OF THE INDIVIDUAL'S EXISTING CONTRACTUAL COMPENSATION OR THE COMPENSATION ESTABLISHED BY THE SCHOOL ENTITY FOR DAY-TO-DAY SUBSTITUTE TEACHERS.(D) EACH SCHOOL ENTITY THAT USES THE SERVICES OF A CLASSROOM MONITOR UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL ENSURE THAT EACH STUDENT WHO RECEIVES SERVICES UNDER AN INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM UNDER THE INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES EDUCATION ACT (PUBLIC LAW 91-230, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 ET SEQ.) RECEIVES A FREE AND APPROPRIATE PUBLIC EDUCATION AS REQUIRED UNDER THE INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES EDUCATION ACT.(E) EACH SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT THE FOLLOWING BY MARCH 31, 2026:(1) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS WHO SERVED AS CLASSROOM MONITORS UNDER THIS SECTION AND THE NUMBER OF DAYS ON WHICH THE SCHOOL ENTITY USED THE SERVICES OF CLASSROOM MONITORS.20250HB1505PN3764 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) THE SCHOOL ENTITY'S DAY-TO-DAY SUBSTITUTE TEACHER COMPENSATION RATES IN EACH OF THE SCHOOL YEARS FROM 2020-2021 THROUGH 2025-2026. FOR A SCHOOL ENTITY THAT USES A THIRD-PARTY ENTITY TO PROVIDE SUBSTITUTE TEACHERS, THE RATE REPORTED BY THE SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL BE THE TAKE-HOME AMOUNT RECEIVED BY AN INDIVIDUAL, EXCLUDING THE PORTION PAID TO THE THIRD-PARTY ENTITY. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE RULES NECESSARY TO EFFECTUATE THIS SUBSECTION.(F) BY APRIL 15, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE A REPORT ON THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE CLASSROOM MONITOR PERMIT AND RECOMMENDATIONS FOR IMPROVEMENT OR CONTINUATION OF THE PERMIT. THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE, BUT NOT BE LIMITED TO, THE INFORMATION REPORTED TO THE DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (E) AND A FORMAL EVALUATION OF THE PERMIT AND ITS EFFECTIVENESS BY AN INDEPENDENT RESEARCH ORGANIZATION WHICH MAY INCLUDE A COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY ACCREDITED BY A REGIONAL ACCREDITING AGENCY. THE REPORT SHALL BE SUBMITTED TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THE STATE BOARD AND SHALL BE POSTED ON THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE.(G) THIS SECTION SHALL EXPIRE ON JUNE 30, 2026.]SECTION 8. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 1218.2. PERMIT FOR CLASSROOM MONITORS.--(A) A SCHOOL ENTITY MAY REQUEST THAT THE DEPARTMENT ISSUE A CLASSROOM MONITOR PERMIT TO ALLOW AN INDIVIDUAL TO DELIVER TO STUDENTS ASSIGNMENTS THAT ARE PREPLANNED AND DEVELOPED BY A PROFESSIONAL EMPLOYE OR TEMPORARY PROFESSIONAL EMPLOYE ASSIGNED TO THE CLASSROOM. A CLASSROOM MONITOR MAY NOT PLAN LESSONS OR CREATE OR GRADE STUDENT WORK AND MAY NOT SERVE IN A SINGLE ASSIGNMENT FOR MORE THAN TWENTY (20) CUMULATIVE SCHOOL DAYS OF SERVICE.(B) AN INDIVIDUAL RECEIVING A PERMIT UNDER SUBSECTION (A) 20250HB1505PN3764 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SHALL SATISFY ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) HAS COMPLETED AT LEAST SIXTY (60) SEMESTER HOURS OR THE EQUIVALENT OF COURSES AT A COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY LOCATED IN THIS COMMONWEALTH AND ACCREDITED BY A REGIONAL ACCREDITING AGENCY OR HAS AT LEAST THREE (3) YEARS' EXPERIENCE AS A PARAPROFESSIONAL IN A SCHOOL ENTITY AND IS CURRENTLY EMPLOYED AS A PARAPROFESSIONAL IN A SCHOOL ENTITY.(2) HAS MET THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SECTIONS 111, 111.1 AND 1109(A) AND 23 PA.C.S. CH. 63 SUBCH. C (RELATING TO POWERS AND DUTIES OF DEPARTMENT).(3) HAS ATTAINED A MINIMUM AGE OF TWENTY-FIVE (25) YEARS.(4) HAS COMPLETED TRAINING ON CLASSROOM MANAGEMENT PROVIDED BY AN INTERMEDIATE UNIT AND APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT.(C) AN INDIVIDUAL RECEIVING A PERMIT UNDER THIS SECTION WHO IS ALREADY EMPLOYED BY THE SCHOOL ENTITY AS A PARAPROFESSIONAL SHALL RECEIVE THE HIGHER OF THE INDIVIDUAL'S EXISTING CONTRACTUAL COMPENSATION OR THE COMPENSATION ESTABLISHED BY THE SCHOOL ENTITY FOR DAY-TO-DAY SUBSTITUTE TEACHERS.(D) EACH SCHOOL ENTITY THAT USES THE SERVICES OF A CLASSROOM MONITOR UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL ENSURE THAT EACH STUDENT WHO RECEIVES SERVICES UNDER AN INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM UNDER THE INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES EDUCATION ACT (PUBLIC LAW 91-230, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 ET SEQ.) RECEIVES A FREE AND APPROPRIATE PUBLIC EDUCATION AS REQUIRED UNDER THE INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES EDUCATION ACT.(E) EACH SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT THE FOLLOWING BY JUNE 30, 2027, AND EACH JUNE 30 THEREAFTER:(1) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS WHO SERVED AS CLASSROOM MONITORS UNDER THIS SECTION AND THE NUMBER OF DAYS ON WHICH THE SCHOOL ENTITY USED THE SERVICES OF CLASSROOM MONITORS.20250HB1505PN3764 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) THE SCHOOL ENTITY'S DAY-TO-DAY SUBSTITUTE TEACHER COMPENSATION RATES. FOR A SCHOOL ENTITY THAT USES A THIRD-PARTY ENTITY TO PROVIDE SUBSTITUTE TEACHERS, THE RATE REPORTED BY THE SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL BE THE TAKE-HOME AMOUNT RECEIVED BY AN INDIVIDUAL, EXCLUDING THE PORTION PAID TO THE THIRD-PARTY ENTITY. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE RULES NECESSARY TO EFFECTUATE THIS SUBSECTION.(F) THIS SECTION SHALL EXPIRE JUNE 30, 2029. SECTION 9. SECTION 1327.2(A.1)(3)(III) OF THE ACT, AMENDED NOVEMBER 12, 2025 (P.L.244, NO.47), IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 1327.2. ATTENDANCE POLICY AT CHARTER, REGIONAL CHARTER AND CYBER CHARTER SCHOOLS.--* * *(A.1) IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (A), A CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL INCLUDE IN ITS ATTENDANCE POLICY THE FOLLOWING:* * *(3) A POLICY TO DETERMINE WHEN A CHILD HAS AN UNEXCUSED OR EXCUSED ABSENCE OR IS PRESENT FOR ASYNCHRONOUS INSTRUCTION. TO BE PRESENT FOR ASYNCHRONOUS INSTRUCTION, A CHILD MUST COMPLETE WEEKLY BENCHMARKS. THE FOLLOWING REQUIREMENTS SHALL APPLY TO THE WEEKLY BENCHMARKS:* * *(III) IF A STUDENT DOES NOT COMPLETE THE WEEKLY BENCHMARK, THE STUDENT SHALL RECEIVE AN ABSENCE [OR OTHER CONSEQUENCE] IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE POLICY UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH.* * *SECTION 10. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 1327.4. SCHOOL DISTRICT ENROLLEE WELLNESS CHECKS.--(A) A SCHOOL DISTRICT SHALL CONDUCT WEEKLY WELLNESS CHECKS FOR EACH STUDENT ENROLLED IN THE SCHOOL DISTRICT THAT RECEIVES 20250HB1505PN3764 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ACADEMIC INSTRUCTION EXCLUSIVELY THROUGH THE SCHOOL DISTRICT'S VIRTUAL INSTRUCTION PROGRAM FOR THE FULL SCHOOL YEAR. A SCHOOL DISTRICT SHALL, AT LEAST ONCE DURING ANY WEEK CONSISTING OF AT LEAST THREE FULL OR PARTIAL DAYS OF ACADEMIC INSTRUCTION, ENSURE THAT EACH STUDENT IS VISIBLY SEEN AND COMMUNICATED WITH IN REAL TIME EITHER IN PERSON OR VIA ELECTRONIC MEANS BY A TEACHER, ADMINISTRATOR OR OTHER REPRESENTATIVE OF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT SUBJECT TO 23 PA.C.S. CH. 63 (RELATING TO CHILD PROTECTIVE SERVICES) IN ORDER TO ENSURE THE WELL-BEING OF THE STUDENT AND VERIFY PARTICIPATION IN THE VIRTUAL INSTRUCTION PROGRAM. THE FOLLOWING APPLY TO A WELLNESS CHECK:(1) THE REQUIREMENT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE SATISFIED BY EACH STUDENT TURNING ON A WEBCAM AND A TEACHER, ADMINISTRATOR OR OTHER REPRESENTATIVE OF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT SUBJECT TO 23 PA.C.S. CH. 63 VISIBLY SEEING AND COMMUNICATING WITH THE STUDENT DURING SYNCHRONOUS ONLINE INSTRUCTION.(2) PARTICIPATION IN VIRTUAL OR FACE-TO-FACE HEALTH SCREENINGS, STANDARDIZED TESTING, ADVISING AND TUTORING AND IN-PERSON SCHOOL-SPONSORED ACTIVITIES CHAPERONED BY A TEACHER, ADMINISTRATOR OR OTHER REPRESENTATIVE OF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT SUBJECT TO 23 PA.C.S. CH. 63 MAY COUNT TOWARD FULFILLING A WELLNESS CHECK UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.(3) THE SCHOOL DISTRICT MAY EXEMPT A STUDENT FROM A WEEKLY WELLNESS CHECK IF THE STUDENT HAS RECEIVED AN EXCUSED ABSENCE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 1329 FOR THE DAY ON WHICH THE WELLNESS CHECK WAS ATTEMPTED. IF A STUDENT HAS AN EXCUSED ABSENCE ON THE DAY A WEEKLY WELLNESS CHECK IS ATTEMPTED, THE SCHOOL DISTRICT SHALL CONDUCT THE CHECK ON THE NEXT SCHOOL DAY OR ON ANOTHER SCHOOL DAY DURING THAT SAME WEEK. IF A STUDENT HAS AN EXCUSED ABSENCE FOR ALL SCHOOL DAYS DURING A WEEK, THE SCHOOL DISTRICT 20250HB1505PN3764 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SHALL EXEMPT A STUDENT FROM A WELLNESS CHECK FOR THAT WEEK.(4) THE SCHOOL DISTRICT MAY EXEMPT A STUDENT FROM A WEEKLY WELLNESS CHECK IF THE STUDENT'S HOUSEHOLD IS EXPERIENCING A DOCUMENTED INTERNET OR POWER OUTAGE DURING THE DAY AND TIME IN WHICH THE WELLNESS CHECK WAS ATTEMPTED. THE SCHOOL DISTRICT SHALL CONDUCT THE WELLNESS CHECK ON THE NEXT SCHOOL DAY OR ON ANOTHER SCHOOL DAY DURING THAT SAME WEEK FOLLOWING RESOLUTION OF THE INTERNET OR POWER OUTAGE. THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF THE STUDENT SHALL PROVIDE DOCUMENTATION OF THE INTERNET OR POWER OUTAGE TO THE SCHOOL DISTRICT AS SOON AS POSSIBLE.(5) WITHIN ONE SCHOOL DAY AFTER A STUDENT FAILS TO COMPLETE A REQUIRED WELLNESS CHECK, THE SCHOOL DISTRICT SHALL:(I) MAKE DOCUMENTED ONGOING EFFORTS TO COMPLETE THE REQUIRED WELLNESS CHECK AND CONTACT THE STUDENT'S PARENT OR GUARDIAN USING AT LEAST TWO DIFFERENT METHODS OF COMMUNICATION; AND(II) PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE STUDENT'S PARENT OR GUARDIAN, IN THEIR PREFERRED LANGUAGE, THAT THE REQUIRED WELLNESS CHECK HAS NOT BEEN COMPLETED.(6) IF THE REQUIRED WELLNESS CHECK IS NOT COMPLETED WITHIN THREE (3) SCHOOL DAYS AFTER THE NOTICE IS SENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (5)(II), THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(I) THE SCHOOL DISTRICT SHALL IMMEDIATELY SCHEDULE A WELLNESS REVIEW CONFERENCE TO OCCUR WITHIN ONE SCHOOL DAY. THE CONFERENCE MAY BE CONDUCTED IN PERSON OR BY ELECTRONIC MEANS AND SHALL BE FOR THE PURPOSE OF COMPLETING THE REQUIRED WELLNESS CHECK THROUGH A REAL-TIME VISUAL INTERACTION WITH THE STUDENT, REESTABLISHING COMMUNICATION WITH THE STUDENT AND THE STUDENT'S PARENT OR GUARDIAN, AND IDENTIFYING INTERVENTIONS TO ENSURE THAT THE STUDENT PARTICIPATES IN FUTURE WELLNESS CHECKS.(II) THE SCHOOL DISTRICT SHALL CONVENE THE WELLNESS REVIEW 20250HB1505PN3764 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CONFERENCE AS SCHEDULED, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE STUDENT OR THE STUDENT'S PARENT OR GUARDIAN PARTICIPATES.(7) IF A STUDENT DOES NOT PARTICIPATE IN THE WELLNESS REVIEW CONFERENCE IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (6)(II), THE SCHOOL DISTRICT SHALL CONDUCT AN IN-PERSON WELLNESS CHECK WITHIN 24 HOURS OF THE SCHEDULED CONFERENCE.(8) A SCHOOL DISTRICT ADMINISTRATOR MAY NOT ALTER ANY ATTENDANCE RECORD FOR WELLNESS CHECKS AFTER THE WELLNESS CHECK IS PERFORMED, UNLESS THE ALTERATION CORRECTS AN ERROR.(B) IF ANY INDICATION OF ABUSE, NEGLECT OR HARM TO A CHILD IS OBSERVED, A SCHOOL DISTRICT ADMINISTRATOR, EMPLOYE OR REPRESENTATIVE SHALL REPORT THE CONCERNS IN ACCORDANCE WITH 23 PA.C.S. CH. 63.(C) NO LATER THAN MARCH 1 OF EACH YEAR FOR THE FOLLOWING SCHOOL YEAR, EACH SCHOOL DISTRICT WITH A VIRTUAL INSTRUCTION PROGRAM SHALL ESTABLISH A WELLNESS CHECK POLICY THAT DEMONSTRATES COMPLIANCE WITH SUBSECTIONS (A) AND (B) AND POST THE WELLNESS CHECK POLICY ON ITS PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE.(D) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUIRE PROOF OF COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION FROM A SCHOOL DISTRICT TO ENSURE THE WELL-BEING OF A STUDENT ENROLLED IN THE SCHOOL DISTRICT THAT RECEIVES ACADEMIC INSTRUCTION EXCLUSIVELY THROUGH THE SCHOOL DISTRICT'S VIRTUAL INSTRUCTION PROGRAM AND TO VERIFY ATTENDANCE IN THE EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM.(E) FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH THIS SECTION MAY RESULT IN THE DEPARTMENT TAKING ONE OR MORE OF THE FOLLOWING ACTIONS:(1) REQUIRING THE SCHOOL DISTRICT TO REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT THE DATE, TIME AND METHOD OF EACH WELLNESS CHECK FOR EACH STUDENT ENROLLED EXCLUSIVELY IN THE SCHOOL DISTRICT'S 20250HB1505PN3764 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 VIRTUAL INSTRUCTION PROGRAM.(2) MANDATING SCHOOL DISTRICT EDUCATORS, ADMINISTRATORS AND STAFF TO COMPLETE CHILD ABUSE RECOGNITION, PREVENTION AND REPORTING TRAINING ANNUALLY.(3) REQUIRING THE SCHOOL DISTRICT TO MEET IN PERSON WITH EACH STUDENT ENROLLED IN A VIRTUAL INSTRUCTION PROGRAM AT LEAST ONCE DURING THE SCHOOL YEAR FOLLOWING THE SCHOOL YEAR IN WHICH THE SCHOOL DISTRICT IS OUT OF COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.(4) PROHIBITING A SCHOOL DISTRICT FROM BEING AWARDED A COMPETITIVE STATE GRANT BY THE DEPARTMENT UNTIL THE SCHOOL DISTRICT DEMONSTRATES COMPLIANCE WITH SUBSECTIONS (A), (B) AND (C).SECTION 11. SECTION 1333(A) AND (C.1) OF THE ACT, AMENDED NOVEMBER 12, 2025 (P.L.244, NO.47), ARE AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:SECTION 1333. PROCEDURE WHEN CHILD IS TRUANT.--(A) WHEN A CHILD IS TRUANT, THE SCHOOL SHALL NOTIFY IN WRITING THE PERSON IN PARENTAL RELATION WITH THE CHILD WHO RESIDES IN THE SAME HOUSEHOLD AS THE CHILD OF THE CHILD'S VIOLATION OF COMPULSORY SCHOOL ATTENDANCE WITHIN TEN (10) SCHOOL DAYS OF THE CHILD'S THIRD UNEXCUSED ABSENCE. THE NOTICE:(1) SHALL INCLUDE A DESCRIPTION OF THE CONSEQUENCES THAT WILL FOLLOW IF THE CHILD BECOMES HABITUALLY TRUANT;(2) SHALL BE IN THE MODE AND LANGUAGE OF COMMUNICATION PREFERRED BY THE PERSON IN PARENTAL RELATION;(2.1) SHALL INCLUDE NOTICE TO THE PERSON IN PARENTAL RELATION THAT A CHILD WHO IS HABITUALLY TRUANT MAY NOT TRANSFER, DURING THE SCHOOL YEAR, TO A CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL UNLESS A JUDGE DETERMINES THAT THE TRANSFER IS IN THE EDUCATIONAL BEST INTEREST OF THE CHILD;20250HB1505PN3764 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2.2) SHALL INCLUDE RESOURCES AVAILABLE TO ASSIST THE CHILD AND THE PERSON IN PARENTAL RELATION WITH RETURNING THE CHILD TO COMPLIANT COMPULSORY SCHOOL ATTENDANCE AND OPPORTUNITIES FOR FURTHER ACADEMIC RECOVERY IN RESPONSE TO THE TRUANT BEHAVIOR;(3) MAY INCLUDE THE OFFER OF A SCHOOL ATTENDANCE IMPROVEMENT CONFERENCE; [OR](4) WHEN TRANSMITTED TO A PERSON WHO IS NOT THE BIOLOGICAL OR ADOPTIVE PARENT, SHALL ALSO BE PROVIDED TO THE CHILD'S BIOLOGICAL OR ADOPTIVE PARENT IF THE PARENT'S MAILING ADDRESS IS ON FILE WITH THE SCHOOL AND THE PARENT IS NOT PRECLUDED FROM RECEIVING THE INFORMATION BY COURT ORDER[.]; AND(5) SHALL INCLUDE A NOTICE DEVELOPED BY THE ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE OF PENNSYLVANIA COURTS, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT, THAT DETAILS THE RIGHT TO REQUEST THE COURT HOLD AN EDUCATIONAL BEST INTEREST HEARING UNDER SUBSECTION (C.1) IF THE CHILD BECOMES HABITUALLY TRUANT . * * *(C.1) A CHILD WHO IS HABITUALLY TRUANT MAY NOT TRANSFER, DURING THE SCHOOL YEAR, TO A CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL UNLESS A JUDGE DETERMINES THAT THE TRANSFER IS IN THE EDUCATIONAL BEST INTEREST OF THE CHILD.(C.2) (1) IF A CITATION HAS NOT BEEN FILED UNDER SECTION 1333.2, A PERSON IN PARENTAL RELATION WHO RESIDES IN THE SAME HOUSEHOLD AS THE CHILD OR THE CHILD IF THE CHILD IS FIFTEEN (15) YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER MAY FILE A REQUEST FOR AN EDUCATIONAL BEST INTEREST HEARING UNDER SUBSECTION (C.1) WITH THE MAGISTERIAL DISTRICT COURT OR MUNICIPAL COURT.(2) THE VENUE FOR AN EDUCATIONAL BEST INTEREST HEARING SHALL BE BASED ON THE LOCATION OF THE SCHOOL IN WHICH THE CHILD IS CURRENTLY ENROLLED, UNLESS THE CHILD IS CURRENTLY ENROLLED IN A 20250HB1505PN3764 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL, IN WHICH CASE THE HEARING VENUE SHALL BE BASED UPON THE RESIDENCE OF THE CHILD. THE JUDGE SHALL ENSURE THAT ALL HEARINGS ARE HELD WITHIN TEN (10) DAYS OF RECEIPT OF A REQUEST UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OR A CITATION UNDER SECTION 1333.2 AND INCLUDE THE SCHOOL IN WHICH THE STUDENT IS CURRENTLY ENROLLED, A PERSON IN PARENTAL RELATION WHO RESIDES IN THE SAME HOUSEHOLD AS THE CHILD AND THE CHILD IF THE CHILD IS FIFTEEN (15) YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER, UNLESS EXCUSED BY THE JUDGE. THE HEARINGS SHALL OCCUR IN PERSON, UNLESS THE JUDGE DEEMS TWO-WAY SIMULTANEOUS COMMUNICATIONS NECESSARY AND IN COMPLIANCE WITH COURT RULES.(3) WHEN DETERMINING THE EDUCATIONAL BEST INTEREST OF THE CHILD UNDER SUBSECTION (C.1), THE JUDGE SHALL CONSIDER THE FOLLOWING:(I) HEALTH AND WELL-BEING OF THE CHILD, INCLUDING ANXIETY AND TRAUMA;(II) ATTENDANCE RECORDS;(III) GRADES;(IV) SCHOOL ENROLLMENT HISTORY;(V) LIKELIHOOD OF SUCCESS IN PROPOSED PROGRAM;(VI) SAFETY CONCERNS, INCLUDING BULLYING;(VII) ACADEMIC ACCESS TO PROGRAMS;(VIII) DISCIPLINARY OR CRIMINAL ACTIONS;(IX) FAMILY SUPPORT; AND(X) ANY OTHER RELEVANT FACTORS.* * *SECTION 12. SECTIONS 1333.2(A) AND 1303.1-A OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 1333.2. PROCEDURE UPON FILING OF CITATION.--(A) THE VENUE FOR THE FILING OF A CITATION UNDER SECTION 1333.1 SHALL BE 20250HB1505PN3764 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 BASED ON THE LOCATION OF THE SCHOOL IN WHICH THE CHILD IS ENROLLED OR SHALL BE ENROLLED EXCEPT WHERE SECTION 1327.2(B) APPLIES. THE JUDGE SHALL ENSURE THAT ALL HEARINGS INCLUDE THE SCHOOL IN WHICH THE CHILD IS CURRENTLY ENROLLED AND A PERSON IN PARENTAL RELATION WHO RESIDES IN THE SAME HOUSEHOLD AS THE CHILD. THE HEARINGS SHALL OCCUR IN-PERSON, UNLESS THE JUDGE DEEMS TWO-WAY SIMULTANEOUS COMMUNICATIONS NECESSARY AND APPROPRIATE IN COMPLIANCE WITH COURT RULES.* * *SECTION 1303.1-A. POLICY RELATING TO BULLYING AND CYBERBULLYING.--(A) [NO LATER THAN JANUARY 1, 2009, EACH] EACH SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL ADOPT A POLICY OR AMEND ITS EXISTING POLICY RELATING TO BULLYING AND CYBERBULLYING AND INCORPORATE THE POLICY INTO THE SCHOOL ENTITY'S CODE OF STUDENT CONDUCT REQUIRED UNDER 22 PA. CODE § 12.3(C) (RELATING TO SCHOOL RULES). THE POLICY SHALL DELINEATE DISCIPLINARY CONSEQUENCES FOR BULLYING AND CYBERBULLYING AND MAY PROVIDE FOR PREVENTION, INTERVENTION AND EDUCATION PROGRAMS, PROVIDED THAT NO SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL BE REQUIRED TO ESTABLISH A NEW POLICY UNDER THIS SECTION IF ONE CURRENTLY EXISTS AND REASONABLY FULFILLS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION. THE POLICY SHALL IDENTIFY THE APPROPRIATE SCHOOL STAFF PERSON TO RECEIVE REPORTS OF INCIDENTS OF ALLEGED BULLYING[.] AND CYBERBULLYING. THE POLICY SHALL REQUIRE ALL INCIDENTS OF ALLEGED BULLYING AND CYBERBULLYING TO BE INVESTIGATED PROMPTLY BY THE SCHOOL ENTITY AND INCLUDE A PROCEDURE FOR INVESTIGATING A REPORT OF AN INCIDENT OF ALLEGED BULLYING OR CYBERBULLYING RECEIVED BY THE SCHOOL ENTITY. AFTER DETERMINING THAT AN INCIDENT OF BULLYING OR CYBERBULLYING HAS OCCURRED, THE SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL IMMEDIATELY NOTIFY, AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE, PARENTS OR LEGAL GUARDIANS OF ANY STUDENT INVOLVED 20250HB1505PN3764 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 IN THE INCIDENT OF THE DETERMINATION.(B) EACH SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL MAKE THE POLICY AVAILABLE ON ITS PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE, IF AVAILABLE, AND IN EVERY CLASSROOM. EACH SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL POST THE POLICY AT A PROMINENT LOCATION WITHIN EACH SCHOOL BUILDING WHERE SUCH NOTICES ARE USUALLY POSTED. EACH SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL ENSURE THAT THE POLICY AND PROCEDURES FOR REPORTING BULLYING AND CYBERBULLYING INCIDENTS ARE REVIEWED WITH STUDENTS WITHIN NINETY (90) DAYS AFTER THEIR ADOPTION AND THEREAFTER AT LEAST ONCE EACH SCHOOL YEAR.(C) EACH SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL REVIEW ITS POLICY EVERY THREE (3) YEARS AND ANNUALLY PROVIDE THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION WITH A COPY OF ITS POLICY RELATING TO BULLYING AND CYBERBULLYING, INCLUDING INFORMATION RELATED TO THE DEVELOPMENT AND IMPLEMENTATION OF ANY BULLYING AND CYBERBULLYING PREVENTION, INTERVENTION AND EDUCATION PROGRAMS. THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE ATTACHED TO OR MADE PART OF THE ANNUAL REPORT REQUIRED UNDER SECTION 1319-B(B).(D) IN ITS POLICY RELATING TO BULLYING AND CYBERBULLYING ADOPTED OR MAINTAINED UNDER SUBSECTION (A), A SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL NOT BE PROHIBITED FROM DEFINING BULLYING AND CYBERBULLYING IN SUCH A WAY AS TO ENCOMPASS ACTS THAT OCCUR OUTSIDE A SCHOOL SETTING IF THOSE ACTS MEET THE REQUIREMENTS CONTAINED IN [SUBSECTION (E)(1), (3) AND (4).] PARAGRAPHS (1), (3) AND (4) OF THE DEFINITION OF "BULLYING" UNDER SUBSECTION (E). IF A SCHOOL ENTITY REPORTS ACTS OF BULLYING TO THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 1319-B(B), IT SHALL REPORT ALL INCIDENTS THAT QUALIFY AS BULLYING AND CYBERBULLYING UNDER THE ENTITY'S ADOPTED DEFINITION OF THAT TERM.(E) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE, ["BULLYING"]20250HB1505PN3764 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE-GENERATED OR MODIFIED MEDIA" SHALL MEAN TEXT, CODE, IMAGES, AUDIO OR VIDEO DATA THAT HAS BEEN CREATED OR MODIFIED FROM ITS ORIGINAL SOURCE DATA THROUGH THE USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TECHNOLOGY, PROGRAMS OR PLATFORMS."BULLYING" SHALL MEAN AN INTENTIONAL ELECTRONIC, WRITTEN, VERBAL OR PHYSICAL ACT, OR A SERIES OF ACTS:(1) DIRECTED AT ANOTHER STUDENT OR STUDENTS;(2) WHICH OCCURS IN A SCHOOL SETTING;(3) THAT IS SEVERE, PERSISTENT OR PERVASIVE; AND(4) THAT HAS THE EFFECT OF DOING ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(I) SUBSTANTIALLY INTERFERING WITH A STUDENT'S EDUCATION;(II) CREATING A THREATENING ENVIRONMENT; OR(III) SUBSTANTIALLY DISRUPTING THE ORDERLY OPERATION OF THE SCHOOL[; AND]."CYBERBULLYING" SHALL MEAN BULLYING THROUGH THE USE OF ELECTRONIC TECHNOLOGY OR COMMUNICATION, INCLUDING DATA, COMPUTER SOFTWARE OR ONLINE PLATFORMS REGARDLESS OF THEIR ORIGIN, USING A DEVICE, SYSTEM, NETWORK, INTERNET SERVICE, EMAIL, SOCIAL MEDIA OR OTHER DIGITAL MEANS, INCLUDING ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE-GENERATED OR MODIFIED MEDIA, WHEN THE CONDUCT MEETS THE CRITERIA IN PARAGRAPHS (1), (3) AND (4) OF THE DEFINITION OF "BULLYING.""SCHOOL ENTITY." A SCHOOL DISTRICT, INTERMEDIATE UNIT, AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL, CHARTER SCHOOL, CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL AND REGIONAL CHARTER SCHOOL.["SCHOOL] "SCHOOL SETTING" SHALL MEAN IN THE SCHOOL, ON SCHOOL GROUNDS, IN SCHOOL VEHICLES, AT A DESIGNATED BUS STOP OR AT ANY ACTIVITY SPONSORED, SUPERVISED OR SANCTIONED BY THE SCHOOL.SECTION 13. SECTION 1301-B OF THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING 20250HB1505PN3764 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DEFINITIONS TO READ:SECTION 1301-B. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS ARTICLE SHALL HAVE THE MEANING GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE-GENERATED OR MODIFIED MEDIA." AS DEFINED IN SECTION 1303.1-A(E).* * *"CYBERBULLYING." AS DEFINED IN SECTION 1303.1-A(E).* * *SECTION 14. SECTION 1306-B(H)(4) OF THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBPARAGRAPH AND THE SUBSECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH TO READ:SECTION 1306-B. SCHOOL SAFETY AND SECURITY GRANT PROGRAM.* * *(H) SCHOOL SAFETY AND SECURITY FUND.--* * *(4) THE FUND MAY ONLY BE USED FOR THE GRANT PROGRAMS AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS ARTICLE AND NO MONEY IN THE FUND MAY BE TRANSFERRED OR DIVERTED TO ANY OTHER PURPOSE BY ADMINISTRATIVE ACTION, EXCEPT THAT THE COMMITTEE:* * *(III) MAY AUTHORIZE THE USE OF UP TO $8,300,000 OF UNEXPENDED, UNCOMMITTED OR UNENCUMBERED MONEY IN THE FUND TO ACCOMPLISH THE COMMITTEE'S RESPONSIBILITIES UNDER THIS ARTICLE RELATED TO THE TRAINING OF SCHOOL EMPLOYEES, SCHOOL SAFETY AND SECURITY COORDINATORS, THREAT ASSESSMENT TEAMS AND SCHOOL SECURITY PERSONNEL AND PROVIDING TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO SCHOOLS.* * *20250HB1505PN3764 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (15) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, DURING THE 2026-2027 FISCAL YEAR, MONEY IN THE FUND SHALL BE USED AS FOLLOWS:(I) ONE HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS AND SEVENTY-FIVE PERCENT OF ANY MONEY IN THE FUND THAT IS UNEXPENDED, UNCOMMITTED OR UNENCUMBERED FROM PRIOR YEARS SHALL BE USED FOR SCHOOL SAFETY AND MENTAL HEALTH GRANTS UNDER SECTION 1314.3-B.(II) TWENTY MILLION SEVEN HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS SHALL BE USED FOR TARGETED SCHOOL SAFETY GRANTS UNDER SECTION 1306.1-B.* * *SECTION 15. SECTION 1309-B(C)(2) OF THE ACT IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 1309-B. SCHOOL SAFETY AND SECURITY COORDINATOR.* * *(C) SPECIFIC DUTIES.--THE SCHOOL SAFETY AND SECURITY COORDINATOR SHALL:* * *(2) COORDINATE TRAINING AND RESOURCES FOR STUDENTS AND SCHOOL ENTITY STAFF IN MATTERS RELATING TO SITUATIONAL AWARENESS, TRAUMA-INFORMED APPROACHES, BEHAVIORAL HEALTH AWARENESS, SUICIDE [AND] AWARENESS AND PREVENTION, BULLYING AND CYBERBULLYING AWARENESS AND PREVENTION, SUBSTANCE ABUSE AWARENESS AND EMERGENCY PROCEDURES AND TRAINING DRILLS, INCLUDING FIRE, NATURAL DISASTER, ACTIVE SHOOTER, HOSTAGE SITUATION AND BOMB THREAT.* * *SECTION 16. SECTION 1310-B(A)(1)(IV) AND (B) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED, SUBSECTION (A)(1) IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBPARAGRAPH 20250HB1505PN3764 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:SECTION 1310-B. SCHOOL SAFETY AND SECURITY TRAINING.(A) SCHOOL ENTITY DUTIES.--SCHOOL ENTITIES, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE SCHOOL SAFETY AND SECURITY COORDINATOR, SHALL PROVIDE THEIR EMPLOYEES WITH MANDATORY TRAINING ON SCHOOL SAFETY AND SECURITY SUBJECT TO THE FOLLOWING BASED ON THE NEEDS OF THE SCHOOL ENTITY:(1) TRAINING SHALL ADDRESS ANY COMBINATION OF ONE OR MORE OF THE FOLLOWING, BASED ON THE NEEDS OF THE SCHOOL ENTITY:* * *(IV) SUICIDE [AND BULLYING AWARENESS] AWARENESS AND PREVENTION.* * *(VIII) BULLYING AND CYBERBULLYING AWARENESS AND PREVENTION.* * *(B) COMMITTEE DUTIES.--[NO LATER THAN SEPTEMBER 30, 2022, THE] THE COMMITTEE SHALL DEVELOP AND ADOPT MINIMUM STANDARDS FOR TRAINING OF SCHOOL EMPLOYEES FOR EACH OF THE TRAINING TOPICS UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) AND (1.1). THE COMMITTEE SHALL MAKE THE STANDARDS ADOPTED AVAILABLE TO SCHOOL ENTITIES AND PROVIDE GEOGRAPHICALLY DISBURSED TRAINING TO SCHOOL EMPLOYEES AT NO COST THAT MEETS THE STANDARDS ADOPTED BY THE COMMITTEE. THE COMMITTEE MAY APPROVE GROUPS, ORGANIZATIONS OR OTHER ENTITIES TO PROVIDE THE TRAINING.(B.1) STANDARDS.--NO LATER THAN DECEMBER 31, 2026, OR 180 DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, WHICHEVER IS LATER, THE COMMITTEE SHALL DEVELOP AND ADOPT MINIMUM STANDARDS FOR THE TRAINING OF SCHOOL EMPLOYEES UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1)(IV) 20250HB1505PN3764 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AND (VIII).* * *SECTION 17. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 1314.3-B. SCHOOL SAFETY AND MENTAL HEALTH GRANTS FOR 2026-2027 SCHOOL YEAR.(A) FUNDING.--FOR THE 2026-2027 SCHOOL YEAR, THE MONEY UNDER SECTION 1306-B(H)(15)(I) SHALL BE USED BY THE COMMITTEE TO AWARD SCHOOL SAFETY AND MENTAL HEALTH GRANTS TO SCHOOL ENTITIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.(B) PURPOSE OF GRANTS.--(1) A SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL BE ELIGIBLE FOR SCHOOL SAFETY AND MENTAL HEALTH GRANTS TO MEET THE LEVEL 1 BASELINE CRITERIA FOR PHYSICAL SECURITY OR BEHAVIORAL HEALTH AND SCHOOL CLIMATE CRITERIA ESTABLISHED BY THE COMMITTEE.(2) IF A SCHOOL ENTITY HAS MET THE LEVEL 1 BASELINE CRITERIA FOR PHYSICAL SECURITY, THE SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL BE ELIGIBLE TO EXPEND FUNDING FOR ACTIVITIES OUTLINED IN SECTION 1306-B(J)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (7), (8), (9), (11), (12), (13), (14), (16), (18), (22), (23), (32) AND (33).(3) IF A SCHOOL ENTITY HAS MET THE LEVEL 1 BASELINE CRITERIA FOR BEHAVIORAL HEALTH AND SCHOOL CLIMATE, THE SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL BE ELIGIBLE TO EXPEND FUNDING FOR ACTIVITIES OUTLINED IN SECTION 1306-B(J)(6), (10), (15), (17), (19), (20), (21), (23), (24), (25), (26), (27), (28), (29), (30) AND (31).(C) AMOUNT OF GRANTS.--THE COMMITTEE SHALL AWARD SCHOOL SAFETY AND MENTAL HEALTH GRANTS TO EACH SCHOOL ENTITY THAT SUBMITS AN APPLICATION IN THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS:(1) A SCHOOL DISTRICT SHALL RECEIVE:(I) $100,000; AND20250HB1505PN3764 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (II) THE AMOUNT DETERMINED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3).(2) AN INTERMEDIATE UNIT, AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL, CHARTER SCHOOL, REGIONAL CHARTER SCHOOL AND CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL RECEIVE $70,000.(3) AN AMOUNT DETERMINED AS FOLLOWS:(I) MULTIPLY THE 2024-2025 ADJUSTED AVERAGE DAILY MEMBERSHIP FOR EACH SCHOOL DISTRICT BY THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN THE AMOUNT ALLOCATED IN SUBSECTION (A) AND THE SUM OF THE AMOUNTS DISTRIBUTED UNDER PARAGRAPHS (1) AND (2).(II) DIVIDE THE PRODUCT FROM SUBPARAGRAPH (I) BY THE 2024-2025 ADJUSTED AVERAGE DAILY MEMBERSHIP FOR ALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS.(D) AVAILABILITY OF APPLICATIONS.--THE COMMITTEE SHALL MAKE AN APPLICATION FOR GRANTS UNDER THIS SECTION AVAILABLE TO SCHOOL ENTITIES NO LATER THAN 45 DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION. THE APPLICATION REQUIREMENTS SHALL BE LIMITED TO THE SCHOOL ENTITY'S CONTACT INFORMATION, THE SPECIFIC PURPOSE OF THE GRANT BASED UPON THE CATEGORIES SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (B), WITH BOXES ON THE APPLICATION FOR THE APPLICANT TO INDICATE THE SCHOOL ENTITY'S ANTICIPATED USE AND CERTIFICATION BY THE APPLICANT THAT THE MONEY WILL BE USED FOR THE STATED PURPOSE.(E) EFFECT OF REVENUE RECEIVED.--GRANT MONEY RECEIVED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE INCLUDED WHEN CALCULATING THE AMOUNT TO BE PAID UNDER SECTION 1725-A.(F) AUDIT AND MONITORING.--THE COMMITTEE SHALL RANDOMLY AUDIT AND MONITOR GRANT RECIPIENTS TO ENSURE THE APPROPRIATE USE OF GRANT MONEY AND COMPLIANCE WITH PROVISIONS OF THE GRANT PROGRAM.(G) DEFINITION.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE TERM "SCHOOL 20250HB1505PN3764 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ENTITY" MEANS A SCHOOL DISTRICT, AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL, INTERMEDIATE UNIT, CHARTER SCHOOL, REGIONAL CHARTER SCHOOL AND CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL.SECTION 18. SECTION 1316-B(A)(9) AND (B)(1) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED, SUBSECTION (A) IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:SECTION 1316-B. SCHOOL SAFETY AND SECURITY COORDINATOR TRAINING.(A) ESTABLISHMENT.--NO LATER THAN SEPTEMBER 30, 2022, THE COMMITTEE SHALL DEVELOP REQUIRED TRAINING CRITERIA FOR A SCHOOL SAFETY AND SECURITY COORDINATOR. AT A MINIMUM, THE TRAINING SHALL INCLUDE:* * *(9) SUICIDE [AND BULLYING AWARENESS] AWARENESS AND PREVENTION.* * *(12) BULLYING AND CYBERBULLYING AWARENESS AND PREVENTION.(A.1) TRAINING CRITERIA.--NO LATER THAN DECEMBER 31, 2026, OR 180 DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, WHICHEVER IS LATER, THE COMMITTEE SHALL DEVELOP REQUIRED TRAINING CRITERIA FOR A SCHOOL SAFETY AND SECURITY COORDINATOR RELATED TO TOPICS UNDER SECTION (A)(9) AND (12).(B) REQUIRED TRAINING.--(1) THE COMMITTEE SHALL ADOPT THE REQUIRED TRAINING HOURS FOR THE TRAINING DEVELOPED UNDER [SUBSECTION (A)] SUBSECTIONS (A) AND (A.1). THE COMMITTEE MAY NOT REQUIRE MORE THAN SEVEN HOURS OF TRAINING FOR THE SCHOOL SAFETY AND SECURITY COORDINATOR ANNUALLY. THE TRAINING SHALL BE IN ADDITION TO OTHER TRAINING REQUIREMENTS FOR SCHOOL 20250HB1505PN3764 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ADMINISTRATORS.* * *SECTION 19. SECTION 1319-B(B) INTRODUCTORY PARAGRAPH, (3), (7)(I) AND (8) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 1319-B. REPORTING AND MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING.* * *(B) REPORTING BY CHIEF SCHOOL ADMINISTRATOR.--A CHIEF SCHOOL ADMINISTRATOR SHALL REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT BY JULY 31 OF EACH YEAR ALL NEW INCIDENTS INVOLVING ACTS OF VIOLENCE, POSSESSION OF A WEAPON OR POSSESSION, USE OR SALE OF CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES AS DEFINED IN THE ACT OF APRIL 14, 1972 (P.L.233, NO.64), KNOWN AS THE CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE, DRUG, DEVICE AND COSMETIC ACT, OR POSSESSION, USE OR SALE OF ALCOHOL OR TOBACCO BY ANY PERSON ON SCHOOL PROPERTY. THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE ALL INCIDENTS INVOLVING CONDUCT THAT CONSTITUTES A CRIMINAL OFFENSE LISTED UNDER PARAGRAPHS (7) AND (8). THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE THE TOTAL NUMBER OF INCIDENTS THAT WERE DETERMINED TO BE BULLYING OR CYBERBULLYING IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 1303.1-A DURING THE SCHOOL YEAR, INCLUDING THE NUMBER OF CYBERBULLYING INCIDENTS SUSPECTED TO INVOLVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE-GENERATED OR MODIFIED MEDIA. REPORTS, ON A FORM TO BE DEVELOPED AND PROVIDED BY THE DEPARTMENT, IN COLLABORATION AND COORDINATION WITH THE COMMITTEE, SHALL INCLUDE:* * *(3) THE CIRCUMSTANCES SURROUNDING THE INCIDENT, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE TYPE OF WEAPON, CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE, ALCOHOL OR TOBACCO, THE DATE, TIME AND LOCATION OF THE INCIDENT, INCLUDING IF THE INCIDENT OCCURRED ONLINE OR INVOLVED THE USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE-GENERATED OR MODIFIED MEDIA, IF A PERSON OTHER THAN A STUDENT IS INVOLVED 20250HB1505PN3764 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 IN THE INCIDENT AND ANY RELATIONSHIP OF THE PERSON TO THE SCHOOL ENTITY.* * *(7) A LIST OF CRIMINAL OFFENSES WHICH MAY, AT A MINIMUM, INCLUDE:(I) THE FOLLOWING OFFENSES UNDER 18 PA.C.S. (RELATING TO CRIMES AND OFFENSES):SECTION 908 (RELATING TO PROHIBITED OFFENSIVE WEAPONS).SECTION 912 (RELATING TO POSSESSION OF WEAPON ON SCHOOL PROPERTY).CHAPTER 25 (RELATING TO CRIMINAL HOMICIDE).SECTION 2702 (RELATING TO AGGRAVATED ASSAULT).SECTION 2709.1 (RELATING TO STALKING).SECTION 2901 (RELATING TO KIDNAPPING).SECTION 2902 (RELATING TO UNLAWFUL RESTRAINT).SECTION 3121 (RELATING TO RAPE).SECTION 3122.1 (RELATING TO STATUTORY SEXUAL ASSAULT).SECTION 3123 (RELATING TO INVOLUNTARY DEVIATE SEXUAL INTERCOURSE).SECTION 3124.1 (RELATING TO SEXUAL ASSAULT).SECTION 3124.2 (RELATING TO INSTITUTIONAL SEXUAL ASSAULT).SECTION 3125 (RELATING TO AGGRAVATED INDECENT ASSAULT).SECTION 3126 (RELATING TO INDECENT ASSAULT).SECTION 3301 (RELATING TO ARSON AND RELATED OFFENSES).SECTION 3307 (RELATING TO INSTITUTIONAL VANDALISM) 20250HB1505PN3764 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 WHEN THE OFFENSE IS A FELONY OF THE THIRD DEGREE.SECTION 3502 (RELATING TO BURGLARY).SECTION 3503(A) AND (B)(1)(V) (RELATING TO CRIMINAL TRESPASS).SECTION 5501 (RELATING TO RIOT).SECTION 6110.1 (RELATING TO POSSESSION OF FIREARM BY MINOR).SECTION 6312 (RELATING TO SEXUAL ABUSE OF CHILDREN).* * *(8) THE FOLLOWING OFFENSES UNDER 18 PA.C.S. AND ANY ATTEMPT, SOLICITATION OR CONSPIRACY TO COMMIT ANY OF THESE OFFENSES:SECTION 2701 (RELATING TO SIMPLE ASSAULT).SECTION 2705 (RELATING TO RECKLESSLY ENDANGERING ANOTHER PERSON).SECTION 2706 (RELATING TO TERRORISTIC THREATS).SECTION 2709 (RELATING TO HARASSMENT).SECTION 3127 (RELATING TO INDECENT EXPOSURE).SECTION 3131 (RELATING TO UNLAWFUL DISSEMINATION OF INTIMATE IMAGE).SECTION 3307 WHEN THE OFFENSE IS A MISDEMEANOR OF THE SECOND DEGREE.SECTION 3503(B)(1)(I), (II), (III) AND (IV), (B.1) AND (B.2).CHAPTER 39 (RELATING TO THEFT AND RELATED OFFENSES).SECTION 4101.1 (RELATING TO DIGITAL FORGERY).SECTION 5502 (RELATING TO FAILURE OF DISORDERLY PERSONS TO DISPERSE UPON OFFICIAL ORDER).SECTION 5503 (RELATING TO DISORDERLY CONDUCT).SECTION 6305 (RELATING TO SALE OF TOBACCO PRODUCTS).20250HB1505PN3764 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 6306.1 (RELATING TO USE OF TOBACCO PRODUCTS IN SCHOOLS PROHIBITED).SECTION 6308 (RELATING TO PURCHASE, CONSUMPTION, POSSESSION OR TRANSPORTATION OF LIQUOR OR MALT OR BREWED BEVERAGES).* * *SECTION 20. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 1322-B. SCHOOL MAPPING SERVICES.(A) CONTRACT REQUIREMENTS.--A CONTRACT FUNDED IN WHOLE OR IN PART WITH MONEY APPROPRIATED BY THE COMMONWEALTH AND ENTERED INTO BETWEEN A SCHOOL ENTITY OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL AND A PROVIDER OF SCHOOL MAPPING SERVICES SHALL COMPLY WITH THE FOLLOWING REQUIREMENTS:(1) MAPS MUST BE IN FORMATS THAT INTEGRATE WITH AND ARE VIEWABLE WITHIN SOFTWARE PLATFORMS USED IN FEDERAL, STATE AND MUNICIPAL PUBLIC SAFETY AGENCIES AND LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES THAT PROVIDE EMERGENCY SERVICES TO THE SCHOOL ENTITY OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL WITHOUT REQUIRING THE PURCHASE OF ADDITIONAL SOFTWARE OR PAYMENT OF FEES TO ACCESS THE DATA. PROVIDERS OF SCHOOL MAPPING SERVICES MUST PROVIDE THE MAPS TO AUTHORIZED LAW ENFORCEMENT AND EMERGENCY RESPONDERS AT NO COST, WITH AUTHORIZATION BY THE SCHOOL ENTITY OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL.(2) MAPS MUST BE IN FORMATS CAPABLE OF BEING PRINTED, SHARED ELECTRONICALLY AND, IF REQUESTED, DIGITALLY INTEGRATED INTO INTERACTIVE MOBILE PLATFORMS IN USE.(3) MAPS MUST BE VIEWABLE AND PRINTABLE FROM OPEN-SOURCE DOCUMENT OR IMAGE VIEWERS.(4) MAPS MUST BE ORIENTED TO TRUE NORTH AND INCLUDE A FIXED GRID WITH CONSISTENT "X" AND "Y" COORDINATES.(5) MAPS MUST HAVE BEEN PRODUCED FROM DATA VERIFIED FOR 20250HB1505PN3764 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ACCURACY THROUGH AN ON-SITE WALK-THROUGH OF THE SCHOOL BUILDINGS AND GROUNDS DEPICTED ON THE MAPS BY THE ENTITY PRODUCING THE DATA.(6) MAPS MUST INCLUDE ACCURATE FLOOR PLANS OVERLAID ON CURRENT, VERIFIED AERIAL IMAGERY OF THE SCHOOL CAMPUS.(7) MAPS AND FLOOR PLANS MUST INCLUDE SITE-SPECIFIC LABELING FOR SCHOOL STRUCTURES, SUCH AS ROOM NAMES, AND/OR DESIGNATED NUMBERS, HALLWAY DESIGNATIONS, EXTERIOR DOOR NUMBERS, STAIRWELL NUMBERS AND THE LOCATIONS OF HAZARDS, CRITICAL UTILITY CONTROLS, CHEMICAL STORAGE AND LABS, WOOD OR METAL WORKING SHOPS, KEY BOXES, AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATORS AND TRAUMA KITS, AND SCHOOL GROUNDS, INCLUDING PARKING AREAS, EQUIPMENT SHEDS, OUTBUILDINGS, ATHLETIC FIELDS, SURROUNDING ROADS AND NEIGHBORING PROPERTIES.(8) MAPS MUST BE CREATED, STORED AND MAINTAINED EXCLUSIVELY WITHIN THE UNITED STATES FOR THE ENTIRE DURATION OF THE MAPPING PROCESS AND DURATION OF THE TERM OF THE CONTRACT TO ENSURE SECURITY OF THE DATA. THE PROVIDER SHALL MAINTAIN AND STORE ALL MAPPING DATA SECURELY AND USE APPROPRIATE SECURITY MEASURES TO REASONABLY PROTECT THE TRANSMISSION OF DATA. IN THE CASE OF A BREACH OF THE SECURITY OF THE MAPPING DATA, THE PROVIDER SHALL IMMEDIATELY NOTIFY THE SCHOOL ENTITY OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL AND ANY LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT HAS BEEN PROVIDED WITH ACCESS TO OR COPIES OF THE MAPPING DATA THAT WAS INCLUDED IN THE DATA BREACH.(B) CONSULTATION AND APPROVAL FROM LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES.--A SCHOOL ENTITY SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION 1319-B SHALL CONSULT AND RECEIVE WRITTEN APPROVAL FROM EACH LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY WITH WHOM THE SCHOOL ENTITY HAS A SIGNED MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING, PRIOR TO ENTERING INTO A 20250HB1505PN3764 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CONTRACT FOR SCHOOL MAPPING SERVICES TO ENSURE THAT THE DATA USED UNDER THE CONTRACT COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION. A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL OR ANY OTHER SCHOOL ENTITY NOT SUBJECT TO SECTION 1319-B SHALL CONSULT AND RECEIVE WRITTEN APPROVAL FROM THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY WITH PRIMARY JURISDICTION OVER THE SCHOOL TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.(C) CONFIDENTIALITY.--MAPS OF SCHOOL ENTITIES AND NONPUBLIC SCHOOLS AND THE DATA USED TO DEVELOP THE MAPS, THE DISCLOSURE OF WHICH WOULD BE REASONABLY LIKELY TO RESULT IN A SUBSTANTIAL AND DEMONSTRABLE RISK OF PHYSICAL HARM OR THE PERSONAL SECURITY OF STUDENTS OR STAFF, SHALL REMAIN CONFIDENTIAL AND ARE NOT PUBLIC RECORDS SUBJECT TO INSPECTION AND DUPLICATION UNDER THE ACT OF FEBRUARY 14, 2008 (P.L.6, NO.3), KNOWN AS THE RIGHT-TO-KNOW LAW.(D) APPLICABILITY.--THIS SECTION SHALL APPLY TO CONTRACTS ENTERED INTO ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION.(E) DEFINITIONS.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"NONPUBLIC SCHOOL." A SCHOOL, OTHER THAN A PUBLIC SCHOOL WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH, IN WHICH A RESIDENT OF THIS COMMONWEALTH MAY LEGALLY FULFILL THE COMPULSORY SCHOOL ATTENDANCE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS ACT AND THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE VI OF THE CIVIL RIGHTS ACT OF 1964 (PUBLIC LAW 88-352, 42 U.S.C. § 2000 ET. SEQ.)."SCHOOL ENTITY." A SCHOOL DISTRICT, INTERMEDIATE UNIT, AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL, CHARTER SCHOOL, CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL AND REGIONAL CHARTER SCHOOL."SCHOOL MAPPING SERVICES." SERVICES THAT CREATE DETAILED MAPPING DATA OF SCHOOL CAMPUSES TO IMPROVE EMERGENCY RESPONSE 20250HB1505PN3764 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AND COORDINATION, AND WHICH DATA IS CREATED IN FILE FORMATS THAT INTEGRATE INTO THE SOFTWARE SYSTEMS IN USE BY PUBLIC SAFETY AGENCIES AND LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES TO ENSURE USE BY PUBLIC SAFETY AGENCIES AND LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES TO LOCATE ROOM NUMBERS, EXITS AND UTILITY AREAS FOR EMERGENCY RESPONSE.SECTION 21. SECTION 1402(A) OF THE ACT IS AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:SECTION 1402. HEALTH SERVICES.--(A) EACH CHILD OF SCHOOL AGE SHALL BE GIVEN BY METHODS ESTABLISHED BY THE ADVISORY HEALTH BOARD, (1) A HEARING TEST BY A SCHOOL NURSE OR MEDICAL TECHNICIAN, (2) A MEASUREMENT OF HEIGHT AND WEIGHT BY A SCHOOL NURSE OR [TEACHER] OTHER HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER, WHO SHALL COLLECT THAT INFORMATION IN A MANNER THAT PROTECTS STUDENT CONFIDENTIALITY AND SHALL USE THE MEASUREMENT TO [COMPUTE] TRACK A CHILD'S [WEIGHT-FOR-HEIGHT RATIO] GROWTH PATTERN UNDER 28 PA. CODE § 23.7 (RELATING TO HEIGHT AND WEIGHT MEASUREMENTS), (3) TESTS FOR TUBERCULOSIS UNDER MEDICAL SUPERVISION, AND (4) SUCH OTHER TESTS AS THE ADVISORY HEALTH BOARD MAY DEEM ADVISABLE TO PROTECT THE HEALTH OF THE CHILD.* * *(A.3) A STUDENT SHALL BE EXEMPT FROM MEASUREMENT OF HEIGHT AND WEIGHT IF THE STUDENT'S PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN REQUESTS AN EXEMPTION IN WRITING. A SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL PROVIDE NOTIFICATION TO A STUDENT'S PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN REGARDING THE PROCEDURE TO REQUEST AN EXEMPTION.* * *SECTION 22. SECTION 1408 OF THE ACT IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 1408. REPORTS.--[EVERY SCHOOL DISTRICT OF THE COMMONWEALTH OR SCHOOL DISTRICTS JOINTLY] (A) SCHOOL ENTITIES, SCHOOL PHYSICIANS, SCHOOL DENTISTS AND SCHOOL NURSES, SHALL FILE 20250HB1505PN3764 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 WITH THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH [AND/OR] AND THE [SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION] SECRETARY OF EDUCATION SUCH REPORTS AS REQUIRED BY THE REGULATIONS OF THE TWO DEPARTMENTS.(B) HEIGHT AND WEIGHT MEASUREMENTS SHALL BE CALCULATED INTO A BODY MASS INDEX BY A SCHOOL NURSE OR OTHER TRAINED HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER EMPLOYED BY A SCHOOL ENTITY SOLELY FOR THE PURPOSE OF REPORTING UNDER THIS SUBSECTION. A SCHOOL ENTITY MAY NOT DELIVER A STUDENT'S BODY MASS INDEX TO EITHER THE STUDENT OR THE STUDENT'S PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN UNLESS REQUESTED BY THE PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN IN WRITING. A SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL REPORT THE RECORDED HEIGHT AND WEIGHT MEASUREMENTS AND BODY MASS INDEX CALCULATION TO THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH IN A MANNER THAT PROTECTS THE CONFIDENTIALITY OF THE STUDENT'S INFORMATION.(C) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, THE TERM "SCHOOL ENTITY" SHALL HAVE THE SAME MEANING GIVEN TO IT IN SECTION 1402(G).SECTION 23. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING SECTIONS TO READ:SECTION 1426. EATING DISORDER AWARENESS AND EDUCATION.--(A) A SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL ANNUALLY MAKE AVAILABLE EDUCATIONAL INFORMATION AND MATERIALS DEVELOPED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) REGARDING EATING DISORDER AWARENESS AND EDUCATION FOR PUPILS IN GRADES SIX THROUGH TWELVE TO PARENTS, GUARDIANS AND KEY SCHOOL PERSONNEL ON THE SCHOOL ENTITY'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE.(B) THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE DEPARTMENT, SHALL:(1) DEVELOP THE EDUCATIONAL INFORMATION AND MATERIALS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A); AND(2) DISSEMINATE THE EDUCATIONAL INFORMATION AND MATERIALS TO SCHOOL ENTITIES.(C) THE EDUCATIONAL INFORMATION AND MATERIALS SHALL:20250HB1505PN3764 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) BE DEVELOPED WITH CONSIDERATION OF THE RECOMMENDATIONS FROM THE EATING DISORDER ADVISORY COMMITTEE ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION.(2) BE POSTED ON THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE IN A VARIETY OF LANGUAGES.(3) EXPLAIN THE IMPORTANCE OF EATING DISORDER PREVENTION EDUCATION AND PROVIDE RESOURCES FOR SCHOOL ENTITIES AND KEY SCHOOL PERSONNEL.(4) LIST THE WARNING SIGNS, RISK FACTORS AND RESOURCES ABOUT EATING DISORDERS.(5) BE UPDATED AT LEAST EVERY FIVE YEARS.(D) THE JOINT STATE GOVERNMENT COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH THE EATING DISORDER ADVISORY COMMITTEE TO OFFER RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE DEPARTMENT AND THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CONCERNING EATING DISORDER AWARENESS AND EDUCATION, INCLUDING THE TYPES AND WARNING SIGNS OF EATING DISORDERS, WEIGHT AND BODY IMAGE DISORDER, EXCESSIVE COMPULSIVE EXERCISE AND ORTHOREXIA NERVOSA. THE COMMITTEE SHALL CONSIST OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:(1) A DESIGNEE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA SCHOOL COUNSELORS ASSOCIATION.(2) A DESIGNEE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA ASSOCIATION OF SCHOOL SOCIAL WORK PERSONNEL.(3) A DESIGNEE OF THE NATIONAL ALLIANCE FOR EATING DISORDERS.(4) A DESIGNEE OF THE ASSOCIATION OF PENNSYLVANIA PROFESSIONAL SCHOOL NURSES.(5) A DESIGNEE REPRESENTING THE ASSOCIATION OF SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGISTS OF PENNSYLVANIA.(6) A DESIGNEE REPRESENTING SPECIAL EDUCATION DIRECTORS OR PUPIL SERVICES DIRECTORS.20250HB1505PN3764 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) A DESIGNEE REPRESENTING COMMUNITY AGENCIES SPECIALIZING IN EATING DISORDER RECOVERY AND TREATMENT CENTERS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH.(8) A DESIGNEE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CHAPTER OF THE AMERICAN ACADEMY OF PEDIATRICS.(9) A DESIGNEE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA ACADEMY OF FAMILY PHYSICIANS.(10) A DESIGNEE OF THE INTERNATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF EATING DISORDERS PROFESSIONALS FOUNDATION AND THE ACADEMY FOR EATING DISORDERS.(E) MEMBERS OF THE EATING DISORDER ADVISORY COMMITTEE SHALL SERVE WITHOUT COMPENSATION.(F) THE COMMITTEE SHALL MEET NO LATER THAN SIXTY (60) DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION AND MEET AT LEAST TWO TIMES IN THE FIRST YEAR. DURING SUBSEQUENT YEARS, THE COMMITTEE SHALL MEET AT LEAST ONCE EVERY THREE YEARS TO RE-ASSESS THE INFORMATION PROVIDED TO SCHOOL ENTITIES AND PARENTS.(G) THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE DEPARTMENT, MAY IDENTIFY AND DEVELOP APPROPRIATE ADDITIONS OR REVISIONS TO THE SCHOOL HEALTH REGULATIONS AND MATERIALS RELATED TO THE DEVELOPMENT OF PARENTAL EDUCATIONAL INFORMATION ON EATING DISORDERS.(H) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO:(1) REQUIRE A SCHOOL ENTITY TO INCUR ANY COST OR PRINT, MAIL OR CREATE ANY MATERIALS; OR(2) PREVENT A SCHOOL ENTITY FROM EXCEEDING THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.(I) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:20250HB1505PN3764 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "DEPARTMENT." THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OF THE COMMONWEALTH."KEY SCHOOL PERSONNEL." INCLUDES SCHOOL PRINCIPALS, VICE PRINCIPALS, SCHOOL NURSES, SCHOOL COUNSELORS AND SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGISTS."SCHOOL ENTITY." A SCHOOL DISTRICT, AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL, CHARTER SCHOOL, CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL, REGIONAL CHARTER SCHOOL OR INTERMEDIATE UNIT.SECTION 1504.1. USE OF FUNDS FOR IMPLEMENTING LATER SCHOOL START TIMES.--(A) TO OFFSET COSTS RELATED TO PLANNING, IMPLEMENTING OR OPERATING A LATER SCHOOL START TIME, A SCHOOL DISTRICT MAY USE MONEY FROM APPROPRIATIONS RECEIVED UNDER SECTIONS 2502.56, 2509.3, 2509.5, 2541 AND 2599.7, AS WELL AS ANY UNRESERVED OR UNDESIGNATED FUND BALANCE THAT IS AVAILABLE.(B) BEFORE ADOPTING A LATER SCHOOL START TIME, A SCHOOL DISTRICT SHALL POST ITS PROPOSAL ON ITS PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE AND SOLICIT PUBLIC COMMENTS ON THE PROPOSED CHANGE AT TWO ADVERTISED PUBLIC MEETINGS OF THE BOARD OF SCHOOL DIRECTORS.(C) UPON ADOPTING A LATER SCHOOL START TIME, THE SCHOOL DISTRICT SHALL REPORT THE NEW START TIME TO THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND PROVIDE THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION WITH ACCOUNTING OF THE MONEY USED UNDER THIS SECTION TO IMPLEMENT THE CHANGE.SECTION 24. SECTION 1506(E) OF THE ACT IS AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING SUBSECTIONS TO READ:SECTION 1506. FLEXIBLE INSTRUCTIONAL DAYS.--* * *[(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE AN ANNUAL SURVEY RELATED TO THE EFFICACY OF FLEXIBLE INSTRUCTIONAL DAYS ON OR BEFORE APRIL 30 OF EACH YEAR TO EACH PUBLIC SCHOOL ENTITY WITH AN ACCEPTED 20250HB1505PN3764 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 APPLICATION. EACH PUBLIC SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL RETURN THE SURVEY TO THE DEPARTMENT BY JUNE 30 OF THE SAME YEAR.](E.1) BEGINNING WITH THE 2026-2027 SCHOOL YEAR AND FOR EACH SCHOOL YEAR THEREAFTER, A PUBLIC SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL SUBMIT THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR EACH SCHOOL BUILDING WITHIN THE PUBLIC SCHOOL ENTITY:(1) THE NUMBER OF FLEXIBLE INSTRUCTIONAL DAYS USED.(2) THE NUMBER OF REMOTE AND VIRTUAL INSTRUCTIONAL DAYS USED BY AN ENTIRE SCHOOL BUILDING THAT WERE NOT APPROVED FLEXIBLE INSTRUCTIONAL DAYS.(3) WHETHER EACH FLEXIBLE INSTRUCTIONAL DAY OR REMOTE AND VIRTUAL INSTRUCTIONAL DAY USED BY AN ENTIRE SCHOOL BUILDING WAS A FULL DAY OR A HALF DAY.(4) THE REASON FOR EACH FLEXIBLE INSTRUCTIONAL DAY OR REMOTE AND VIRTUAL INSTRUCTIONAL DAY USED BY AN ENTIRE SCHOOL BUILDING.(5) LEGAL AUTHORITY FOR REMOTE AND VIRTUAL INSTRUCTIONAL DAYS.(6) ANY OTHER INFORMATION DETERMINED BY THE SECRETARY.(E.2) THE INFORMATION SUBMITTED UNDER SUBSECTION (E.1) SHALL BE SUBMITTED IN A FORM AND MANNER DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT BY JULY 31, 2027, AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING SCHOOL YEAR. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE A REPORT TO THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE EDUCATION COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE AND THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE EDUCATION COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES BY OCTOBER 1 OF EACH YEAR.(E.3) PRIOR TO FINALIZING ITS ACADEMIC CALENDAR FOR A SCHOOL YEAR, THE PUBLIC SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL DISCUSS THE USE OR POTENTIAL USE OF FLEXIBLE INSTRUCTIONAL DAYS AND REMOTE OR VIRTUAL INSTRUCTIONAL DAYS THAT APPLY TO ENTIRE SCHOOL BUILDINGS 20250HB1505PN3764 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FOR THAT SCHOOL YEAR AT AN OPEN MEETING UNDER 65 PA.C.S. CH. 7 (RELATING TO OPEN MEETINGS).* * *SECTION 25. SECTION 1512.1 OF THE ACT IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 1512.1. PHYSICAL EDUCATION.--[THE] (A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (B), THE BOARD OF SCHOOL DIRECTORS IN EVERY SCHOOL [DISTRICT] ENTITY SHALL ESTABLISH A CURRICULUM ALIGNED WITH PENNSYLVANIA ACADEMIC STANDARDS ON HEALTH, SAFETY AND PHYSICAL EDUCATION THAT PURSUANT TO 22 PA. CODE § 4.27 (RELATING TO PHYSICAL EDUCATION AND ATHLETICS), REQUIRES PUPILS ENROLLED IN THE DISTRICT TO PARTICIPATE IN PHYSICAL EDUCATION.(B) THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY TO ACADEMIC INSTRUCTION ON PERSONAL HEALTH, NUTRITION AND PHYSICAL FITNESS:(1) THE CALCULATION OF BODY MASS INDEX SHALL BE PROHIBITED.(2) ANY INSTRUCTION THAT REQUIRES THE COLLECTION OF A STUDENT'S HEIGHT AND WEIGHT MEASUREMENT INFORMATION SHALL BE CONDUCTED IN A MANNER THAT PROTECTS STUDENT CONFIDENTIALITY.(C) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE TERM "SCHOOL ENTITY" MEANS A SCHOOL DISTRICT, INTERMEDIATE UNIT, AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL, CHARTER SCHOOL, CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL AND REGIONAL CHARTER SCHOOL.SECTION 26. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 1512.2. RECESS PERIODS.--(A) A SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL PROVIDE AT LEAST THIRTY MINUTES OF RECESS DURING EACH SCHOOL DAY IN FULL-DAY KINDERGARTEN THROUGH GRADE FIVE AND AT LEAST FIFTEEN MINUTES OF RECESS DURING EACH SCHOOL DAY IN HALF-DAY KINDERGARTEN, SUBJECT TO THE FOLLOWING:(1) A SCHOOL ENTITY MAY NOT REDUCE A STUDENT'S LUNCH TIME IN ORDER TO PROVIDE RECESS UNDER THIS SECTION.(2) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT 20250HB1505PN3764 - 49 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE ABILITY OF A SCHOOL ENTITY OR ITS EMPLOYES TO WITHHOLD, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, RECESS AS A DISCIPLINARY MEASURE FOR VIOLATIONS OF THE SCHOOL ENTITY'S CODE OF STUDENT CONDUCT ESTABLISHED UNDER 22 PA. CODE § 12.3(C) (RELATING TO SCHOOL RULES) OR OTHER SCHOOL ENTITY POLICIES OR CLASSROOM RULES.(3) A SCHOOL ENTITY MAY NOT REDUCE INSTRUCTIONAL TIME IN SUBJECTS THAT ARE NOT ASSESSED BY A STATE ASSESSMENT AS DEFINED IN SECTION 1502-I IN ORDER TO PROVIDE RECESS, UNLESS INSTRUCTIONAL TIME IS ALSO PROPORTIONALLY REDUCED IN SUBJECTS ASSESSED BY A STATE ASSESSMENT.(4) A SCHOOL ENTITY MAY ADJUST AND REDUCE THE AMOUNT OF RECESS TIME REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE STARTING TIME OR DISMISSAL TIME OF A SCHOOL DAY IS DELAYED OR ADJUSTED FROM NORMAL TIMES.(5) WHEN POSSIBLE, RECESS SHALL BE PROVIDED OUTSIDE AND SHALL NOT INVOLVE THE USE OF ELECTRONIC DEVICES.(B) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"KINDERGARTEN" MEANS A ONE-YEAR FORMAL EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM THAT OCCURS DURING THE SCHOOL YEAR IMMEDIATELY PRIOR TO FIRST GRADE."RECESS" MEANS A PERIOD OF TIME DURING THE REGULAR SCHOOL DAY DURING WHICH A STUDENT IS GIVEN A BREAK FROM STRUCTURED CLASSROOM INSTRUCTION AND AN OPPORTUNITY TO ENGAGE IN PHYSICAL ACTIVITY, UNSTRUCTURED PLAY OR SOCIAL INTERACTION WITH OTHER STUDENTS. THE TERM SHALL NOT INCLUDE LUNCH TIME OR A PERIOD OF PHYSICAL EDUCATION AS PROVIDED UNDER SECTION 1512.1."SCHOOL ENTITY" MEANS A SCHOOL DISTRICT, INTERMEDIATE UNIT, AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL, CHARTER SCHOOL OR REGIONAL 20250HB1505PN3764 - 50 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CHARTER SCHOOL.SECTION 27. SECTION 1551(A)(1) AND (2) INTRODUCTORY PARAGRAPH, (C), (D) AND (F) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED AND SUBSECTION (B.1) IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH TO READ:SECTION 1551. ECONOMIC EDUCATION AND PERSONAL FINANCIAL LITERACY PROGRAMS.--(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL HAVE THE POWER AND ITS DUTY SHALL BE TO:(1) PROVIDE RESOURCE INFORMATION ON ECONOMICS, ECONOMIC EDUCATION AND PERSONAL FINANCIAL LITERACY TO EDUCATORS AND PUBLIC AND [PRIVATE] NONPUBLIC SCHOOLS AND ORGANIZATIONS. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVIEW AND UPDATE ITS EXISTING RESOURCE INFORMATION FOLLOWING COMPLETION OF THE REVIEW OF THE STATE STANDARDS UNDER THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION'S STANDARDS UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(II).(2) PROVIDE FOR THE DISTRIBUTION, INCLUDING THROUGH THE DEPARTMENT'S INTERNET WEBSITE, TO SCHOOL ENTITIES AND [PRIVATE,] NONPUBLIC, ELEMENTARY OR SECONDARY SCHOOLS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH, OF MODEL CURRICULUM MATERIALS AND OTHER AVAILABLE RESOURCES, INCLUDING ECONOMIC EDUCATION PARTNERSHIP PROGRAMS, ON ECONOMIC EDUCATION AND PERSONAL FINANCIAL LITERACY, INCLUDING THE BASIC PRINCIPLE INVOLVED WITH EARNING, SPENDING, SAVING AND INVESTING MONEY. THE MODEL CURRICULUM MATERIALS SHALL ALIGN WITH AND COMPLEMENT EXISTING STATE STANDARDS FOR PERSONAL FINANCIAL LITERACY AS SET FORTH IN 22 PA. CODE CH. 4 (RELATING TO ACADEMIC STANDARDS AND ASSESSMENT). THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:* * *(B.1) * * *(5.1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISIONS IN THIS SECTION, A RIGOROUS COURSE OF STUDY THAT INCLUDES A TARGETED FOCUS ON PERSONAL FINANCIAL LITERACY CONTENT AND IS EMBEDDED WITHIN A 20250HB1505PN3764 - 51 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 BUSINESS, ECONOMICS, MATHEMATICS, SOCIAL STUDIES, CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION OR OTHER RELATED COURSE SHALL SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION. FOR PURPOSES OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE TERM "RIGOROUS COURSE OF STUDY" MEANS AN ACADEMICALLY RIGOROUS COLLEGE-LEVEL COURSE, INCLUDING ADVANCED PLACEMENT, INTERNATIONAL BACCALAUREATE, CAMBRIDGE INTERNATIONAL, DUAL CREDIT OR A CONCENTRATED CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION PROGRAM.* * *[(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONVENE A TASK FORCE ON ECONOMIC EDUCATION AND PERSONAL FINANCIAL LITERACY EDUCATION WITHIN NINETY (90) DAYS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.(2) THE TASK FORCE SHALL CONSIST OF NINE (9) MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE SECRETARY, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE SECRETARY OF BANKING, REPRESENTING SCHOOL ADMINISTRATORS, FINANCE OR ECONOMICS TEACHERS, SCHOOL BOARDS, STUDENTS, BUSINESS LEADERS, FACULTY FROM THIS COMMONWEALTH'S INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION HAVING A BACKGROUND IN OR KNOWLEDGE OF PERSONAL FINANCIAL LITERACY AND OTHER GROUPS WITH EXPERTISE IN FINANCIAL LITERACY EDUCATION. THE TASK FORCE SHALL ELECT ONE (1) OF ITS MEMBERS TO SERVE AS CHAIRPERSON.(3) THE TASK FORCE SHALL:(I) ASSESS THE TRENDS AND NEEDS IN ECONOMIC EDUCATION AND PERSONAL FINANCIAL LITERACY.(II) CONSIDER THE MANNER IN WHICH ANY FUNDS ARE USED TO SUPPORT ECONOMIC EDUCATION AND PERSONAL FINANCIAL LITERACY ACTIVITIES.(III) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE GOVERNOR AND THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY REGARDING LEGISLATIVE OR REGULATORY CHANGES TO IMPROVE ECONOMIC EDUCATION AND PERSONAL FINANCIAL LITERACY, PURSUANT TO THE PREPARATION AND SUBMITTAL OF THE REPORT REQUIRED BY 20250HB1505PN3764 - 52 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SUBSECTION (D).(D) THE SECRETARY AND THE SECRETARY OF BANKING SHALL JOINTLY PREPARE AND SUBMIT, IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE TASK FORCE, A BIENNIAL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE STATUS OF ECONOMIC EDUCATION AND PERSONAL FINANCIAL LITERACY PROGRAMS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH. IN ADDITION TO THE RECOMMENDATIONS MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C)(3)(III), THE REPORT SHALL OUTLINE ECONOMIC EDUCATION AND PERSONAL FINANCIAL LITERACY PROGRAMS AND ACHIEVEMENTS, HIGHLIGHT NEW INITIATIVES AND RECOMMEND FUTURE PROGRAM NEEDS.]* * *(F) THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS SECTION SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION:"DEPARTMENT." THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OF THE COMMONWEALTH."EDUCATOR." AS DEFINED IN SECTION 1.2 OF THE ACT OF DECEMBER 12, 1973 (P.L.397, NO.141), KNOWN AS THE "EDUCATOR DISCIPLINE ACT.""NONPUBLIC SCHOOL." A [NONPROFIT] SCHOOL, OTHER THAN A PUBLIC SCHOOL, WHERE A RESIDENT OF THIS COMMONWEALTH MAY LEGALLY FULFILL THE COMPULSORY SCHOOL ATTENDANCE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS ACT AND [WHICH MEET] THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF [42 U.S.C. CH. 21 SUBCH. V (RELATING TO FEDERALLY ASSISTED PROGRAMS).] TITLE VI OF THE CIVIL RIGHTS ACT OF 1964 (PUBLIC LAW 88-352, 78 STAT. 241)."PERSONAL FINANCIAL LITERACY." THE INTEGRATION OF VARIOUS FACTORS RELATING TO PERSONAL FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT, INCLUDING UNDERSTANDING FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS, USING MONEY, LEARNING TO MANAGE PERSONAL ASSETS AND LIABILITIES, CREATING BUDGETS AND ANY 20250HB1505PN3764 - 53 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OTHER FACTORS THAT MAY ASSIST AN INDIVIDUAL IN THIS COMMONWEALTH TO BE FINANCIALLY RESPONSIBLE."PLANNING PERIOD." A PERIOD OF TIME DURING A SCHOOL DAY WHICH AN EDUCATOR MAY USE FOR PROFESSIONAL DUTIES, INCLUDING INSTRUCTIONAL PREPARATION AND PLANNING, COMMUNICATIONS WITH PARENTS AND LEGAL GUARDIANS OF STUDENTS AND EVALUATING STUDENT WORK."SCHOOL ENTITY." A SCHOOL DISTRICT, CHARTER SCHOOL, CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL, REGIONAL CHARTER SCHOOL, INTERMEDIATE UNIT OR AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL."SECRETARY." THE SECRETARY OF EDUCATION OF THE COMMONWEALTH.SECTION 28. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 1556. SOCIAL MEDIA LITERACY EDUCATION.--(A) THE STANDARDS ADOPTED BY THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH 22 PA. CODE CH. 4 (RELATING TO ACADEMIC STANDARDS AND ASSESSMENT) SHALL INCLUDE:(1) THE EFFECTS OF SOCIAL MEDIA AND MOBILE DEVICE USAGE ON STUDENTS, INCLUDING POTENTIAL MENTAL, PSYCHOLOGICAL AND PHYSICAL IMPACTS.(2) THE POTENTIAL IMPACTS OF SOCIAL MEDIA AND MOBILE DEVICE USAGE ON ACADEMIC GROWTH AND LEARNING.(3) HOW TO USE SOCIAL MEDIA SAFELY, INCLUDING HOW TO IDENTIFY SUSPICIOUS ONLINE BEHAVIOR SUCH AS CYBERBULLYING, PREDATORY BEHAVIOR AND POTENTIAL HUMAN TRAFFICKING.(4) HOW TO MAINTAIN PERSONAL SECURITY ON MOBILE DEVICES.(B) THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION:(1) MAY REVIEW THE EXISTING STATE STANDARDS FOR HEALTH, SAFETY AND PHYSICAL EDUCATION, AS SPECIFIED IN 22 PA. CODE CH. 4 TO REVISE THE STANDARDS AS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION; AND20250HB1505PN3764 - 54 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) SHALL CONSIDER THE RECOMMENDATIONS PROVIDED BY THE JOINT STATE GOVERNMENT COMMISSION'S TASK FORCE ON CHILD PROTECTION IN THE DIGITAL AGE UNDER SUBSECTION (D) WHEN DEVELOPING THE STANDARDS UNDER SUBSECTION (A).(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:(1) DEVELOP AND MAKE AVAILABLE TO SCHOOL ENTITIES AND NONPUBLIC SCHOOLS MATERIALS ON SOCIAL MEDIA LITERACY.(2) MAKE AVAILABLE SOCIAL MEDIA LITERACY PROGRAMMING IN THE CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL EDUCATION HOURS DEVELOPED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 1205.2(F).(3) CONSIDER THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE JOINT STATE GOVERNMENT COMMISSION'S TASK FORCE ON CHILD PROTECTION IN THE DIGITAL AGE UNDER SUBSECTION (D).(D) THE JOINT STATE GOVERNMENT COMMISSION'S TASK FORCE ON CHILD PROTECTION IN THE DIGITAL AGE ESTABLISHED UNDER SENATE RESOLUTION 244 OF 2026 SHALL PROVIDE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION AND THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION NO LATER THAN DECEMBER 31, 2026. THE RECOMMENDATIONS SHALL ADDRESS THE CRITERIA SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (A)(1), (2), (3) AND (4), AS WELL AS ANY ADDITIONAL MATTERS THAT THE TASK FORCE CONSIDERS IMPORTANT TO ENSURE THAT STUDENTS CAN CRITICALLY EVALUATE, ETHICALLY CREATE, RESPONSIBLY SHARE AND SAFELY ACCESS AND USE INFORMATION ACROSS DIGITAL PLATFORMS.(E) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL SUPERSEDE OR PREEMPT ANY PROVISION OF A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT BETWEEN A SCHOOL ENTITY AND AN EMPLOYE ORGANIZATION.(F) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"DEPARTMENT" SHALL MEAN THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OF THE 20250HB1505PN3764 - 55 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 COMMONWEALTH."NONPUBLIC SCHOOL" SHALL MEAN A SCHOOL, OTHER THAN A PUBLIC SCHOOL LOCATED WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH, IN WHICH A RESIDENT OF THIS COMMONWEALTH MAY LEGALLY FULFILL THE COMPULSORY SCHOOL ATTENDANCE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS ACT AND THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE VI OF THE CIVIL RIGHTS ACT OF 1964 (PUBLIC LAW 88-352, 78 STAT. 241)."SCHOOL ENTITY" SHALL MEAN A SCHOOL DISTRICT, INTERMEDIATE UNIT, AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL, CHARTER SCHOOL, REGIONAL CHARTER SCHOOL OR CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL.SECTION 29. THE DEFINITION OF "ELIGIBLE PROVIDER" IN SECTION 1511-D OF THE ACT IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 1511-D. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS SUBARTICLE SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:* * *"ELIGIBLE PROVIDER." ANY OF THE FOLLOWING ENTITIES IF THE ENTITY COMPLIES WITH ALL QUALITY PROGRAM STANDARDS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION:(1) A SCHOOL DISTRICT.(1.1) AN INTERMEDIATE UNIT.(2) A HEAD START PROGRAM.(3) A NURSERY SCHOOL LICENSED UNDER THE ACT OF JANUARY 28, 1988 (P.L.24, NO.11), KNOWN AS THE PRIVATE ACADEMIC SCHOOLS ACT.(4) ONE OF THE FOLLOWING:(I) PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2009, A CHILD DAY CARE CENTER OR A GROUP DAY CARE HOME THAT HAS MET OR EXCEEDED THE STANDARDS OF STAR 2 UNDER THE KEYSTONE STARS QUALITY 20250HB1505PN3764 - 56 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RATING SYSTEM ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC WELFARE.(II) AFTER JUNE 30, 2009, A CHILD DAY CARE CENTER OR A GROUP DAY CARE HOME THAT HAS MET OR EXCEEDED THE STANDARDS OF STAR 3 UNDER THE KEYSTONE STARS QUALITY RATING SYSTEM ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC WELFARE. ANY APPROVED PROVIDER UNDER THIS SUBPARAGRAPH WHICH HAS APPLIED FOR A STAR 3 RATING AND WHICH APPLICATION HAS NOT BEEN APPROVED OR REJECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT AS OF JUNE 30, 2009, SHALL REMAIN ELIGIBLE FOR THE PROGRAM UNTIL SUCH APPLICATION IS REJECTED.* * *SECTION 30. SECTION 1515-D(A)(2) OF THE ACT IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 1515-D. DUTIES OF APPROVED PROVIDERS.(A) GENERAL RULE.--AN APPROVED PROVIDER THAT RECEIVES GRANT FUNDS UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING DUTIES:* * *(2) [PLAN TO PROVIDE NO FEWER THAN 180 DAYS OF PRE-KINDERGARTEN OVER THE COURSE OF THE SCHOOL YEAR.] PROVIDE, OVER THE SCHOOL YEAR, A MINIMUM OF 180 DAYS OF PRE-KINDERGARTEN INSTRUCTION OR 900 HOURS OF PRE-KINDERGARTEN INSTRUCTION FOR A FULL-DAY PROGRAM OR 450 HOURS OF PRE-KINDERGARTEN INSTRUCTION FOR A HALF-DAY PROGRAM. A HALF-DAY PROGRAM SHALL PROVIDE NO FEWER THAN TWO AND ONE-HALF HOURS OF INSTRUCTIONAL ACTIVITIES PER DAY. A FULL-DAY PROGRAM SHALL PROVIDE NO FEWER THAN FIVE HOURS OF INSTRUCTIONAL ACTIVITIES PER DAY.* * *SECTION 31. SECTION 1607(B.3)(4) OF THE ACT, ADDED NOVEMBER 20250HB1505PN3764 - 57 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 12, 2025 (P.L.244, NO.47), IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 1607. ATTENDANCE IN OTHER DISTRICTS.--* * *(B.3) FOR A SCHOOL DISTRICT THAT ELIMINATED ITS HIGH SCHOOL UNDER SUBSECTION (B), IF SUFFICIENT FUNDS ARE AVAILABLE, THE SECRETARY OF EDUCATION SHALL ESTABLISH A PROJECT TEAM WHICH SHALL CONDUCT AN ASSESSMENT OF THE EDUCATIONAL, FINANCIAL, ADMINISTRATIVE AND COMMUNITY IMPACTS OF CONSOLIDATION OF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT WITH ANOTHER SCHOOL DISTRICT. THE FOLLOWING APPLY:* * *(4) THE PROJECT TEAM SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT, INCLUDING ITS FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS, TO THE SECRETARY OF EDUCATION, THE EDUCATION COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE AND THE EDUCATION COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES[.] NO LATER THAN MARCH 1, 2027. THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE A PLAN THAT ADDRESSES THE CONSOLIDATION OF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT WITH AN IDENTIFIED SCHOOL DISTRICT AND AN EVALUATION OF SAFETY AND SECURITY ISSUES, BUILDING AND FACILITY REQUIREMENTS, GOVERNANCE ISSUES, FINANCIAL IMPACTS AND NECESSARY ENHANCEMENTS TO EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM OFFERINGS.* * *SECTION 32. SECTION 1723-A OF THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:SECTION 1723-A. ENROLLMENT.--* * *(A.1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, PRIOR TO ENROLLING A STUDENT AFTER THE START OF THE SCHOOL YEAR:(1) A CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL CONFIRM WITH THE STUDENT'S PRIOR SCHOOL ENTITY OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL THAT THE STUDENT IS NOT HABITUALLY TRUANT DURING THE CURRENT SCHOOL YEAR.(2) A CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL CONTACT THE STUDENT'S PRIOR SCHOOL ENTITY OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL FOR THE STUDENT'S ATTENDANCE 20250HB1505PN3764 - 58 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RECORD AND INFORMATION AS TO WHETHER THE STUDENT IS HABITUALLY TRUANT. NO LATER THAN FIVE (5) BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL'S WRITTEN REQUEST FOR INFORMATION, THE STUDENT'S PRIOR SCHOOL ENTITY OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL SHALL PROVIDE THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL WITH THE STUDENT'S ATTENDANCE AND TRUANCY RECORD.(3) A CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL MAY NOT ENROLL A STUDENT WHO IS HABITUALLY TRUANT DURING THE CURRENT SCHOOL YEAR AND MAY NOT RECEIVE PAYMENT UNDER SECTION 1725-A OR 1725.1-A FOR A HABITUALLY TRUANT STUDENT WHO TRANSFERS TO THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL UNLESS A JUDGE DETERMINES THAT THE TRANSFER IS IN THE EDUCATIONAL BEST INTEREST OF THE CHILD IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 1333(C.1).* * *SECTION 33. SECTION 1743-A(D) INTRODUCTORY PARAGRAPH, (5) AND (10) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED AND THE SUBSECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH TO READ:SECTION 1743-A. CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL REQUIREMENTS AND PROHIBITIONS.* * *(D) PARENT OR GUARDIAN.--[UPON REQUEST AND PRIOR TO THE] PRIOR TO A STUDENT'S FIRST DAY IN A CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL AND ANNUALLY FOR ALL STUDENTS, THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL, EITHER IN WRITING OR ELECTRONICALLY, PROVIDE TO THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF A STUDENT THE FOLLOWING:* * *(5) THE MEETINGS TO BE HELD DURING THE SCHOOL YEAR BETWEEN A PARENT OR GUARDIAN AND A TEACHER AND AMONG OTHER SCHOOL OFFICIALS OR PARENTS OR GUARDIANS, INCLUDING WELLNESS REVIEW CONFERENCES IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 1748.1-A, AND 20250HB1505PN3764 - 59 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE MANNER IN WHICH THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN WILL BE NOTIFIED OF THE TIME AND PLACE FOR THE MEETING.* * *(10) COPIES OF POLICIES RELATING TO COMPUTER SECURITY AND PRIVACY, TRUANCY, ABSENCES, WELLNESS CHECKS, DISCIPLINE AND WITHDRAWAL OR EXPULSION OF STUDENTS.* * *(14) RESOURCES AVAILABLE TO ASSIST STUDENTS AND FAMILIES WITH MAINTAINING COMPULSORY SCHOOL ATTENDANCE WHILE ENROLLED IN CYBER EDUCATION.* * *SECTION 34. SECTIONS 1748-A(A) AND (B) INTRODUCTORY PARAGRAPH AND (1) AND 1748.1-A(A), (B), (C) AND (E)(4) OF THE ACT, AMENDED OR ADDED JULY 11, 2024 (P.L.618, NO.55) AND NOVEMBER 12, 2025 (P.L.244, NO.47), ARE AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 1748-A. ENROLLMENT AND NOTIFICATION.(A) NOTICE TO SCHOOL DISTRICT.--(1) WITHIN 10 DAYS OF THE ENROLLMENT OF A STUDENT TO A CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL, [THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN AND] THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL NOTIFY THE STUDENT'S SCHOOL DISTRICT OF RESIDENCE OF THE ENROLLMENT THROUGH THE USE OF THE NOTIFICATION FORM UNDER SUBSECTION (B). THE NOTIFICATION FORM SUBMITTED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH FOR A STUDENT WHO ENROLLS IN THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL BETWEEN JULY 1 AND SEPTEMBER 15 SHALL SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPHS (1.2) AND (1.3) FOR THAT SCHOOL YEAR.(1.1) [THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF A STUDENT ENROLLED IN A CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL ALSO USE THE FORM DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) TO SUBMIT CONTINUED PROOF OF THE STUDENT'S RESIDENCE TO THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL AND THE STUDENT'S 20250HB1505PN3764 - 60 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SCHOOL DISTRICT OF RESIDENCE BY NOVEMBER 1 AND BY MARCH 1 OF EACH SCHOOL YEAR. THE NOTIFICATION FORM OF A NEWLY ENROLLED CYBER CHARTER STUDENT SHALL SATISFY THE FIRST NOVEMBER 1 OR MARCH 1 NOTIFICATION DEADLINE, WHICHEVER IS SOONER.] A STUDENT IDENTIFIED AS HOMELESS UNDER 42 U.S.C. § 11302 (RELATING TO GENERAL DEFINITION OF HOMELESS INDIVIDUAL) MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO SUBMIT THE HOME ADDRESS INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1) OR (6)[.] OR PROVIDE CONTINUED PROOF OF THE STUDENT'S RESIDENCY UNDER PARAGRAPH (1.2).(1.2) NO EARLIER THAN JULY 1 AND NO LATER THAN SEPTEMBER 15 OF EACH SCHOOL YEAR, A CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL NOTIFY THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF EACH STUDENT ENROLLED IN THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL THAT THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN MUST PROVIDE CONTINUED PROOF OF THE STUDENT'S RESIDENCE TO THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL BY SEPTEMBER 30 OF EACH SCHOOL YEAR. THE NOTIFICATION SHALL INCLUDE THE NOTIFICATION FORM DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) AND INSTRUCTIONS FOR SUBMITTING THE NOTIFICATION FORM AND PROOF OF RESIDENCE TO THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL.(1.3) THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL ENSURE THAT THE NOTIFICATION FORM AND PROOF OF RESIDENCE ARE RECEIVED FROM A PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF EACH CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL STUDENT BY SEPTEMBER 30 AND SHALL TRANSMIT ALL INFORMATION RECEIVED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1.2) TO THE STUDENT'S SCHOOL DISTRICT OF RESIDENCE BY OCTOBER 15.(1.4) A SCHOOL DISTRICT OF RESIDENCE MAY WITHHOLD TUITION PAYMENTS TO A CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL FOR A STUDENT FOR WHOM THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL HAS NOT PROVIDED THE NOTIFICATION FORM AND PROOF OF RESIDENCE IN COMPLIANCE WITH 20250HB1505PN3764 - 61 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PARAGRAPH (1.3) OR (1.6). AFTER A CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL HAS PROVIDED THE NOTIFICATION FORM AND PROOF OF RESIDENCE, THE SCHOOL DISTRICT OF RESIDENCE SHALL MAKE ANY OUTSTANDING PAYMENTS WITHIN 30 DAYS TO THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL FOR ALL PERIODS DURING WHICH THE STUDENT WAS ENROLLED IN THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL FOR THE CURRENT SCHOOL YEAR.(1.5) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT DEDUCT TUITION PAYMENTS UNDER SECTIONS 1725-A AND 1725.1-A FOR A STUDENT FOR WHOM THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL HAS NOT PROVIDED THE NOTIFICATION FORM AND PROOF OF RESIDENCE IN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEDUCT TUITION PAYMENTS UNDER SECTIONS 1725-A AND 1725.1-A, AS APPLICABLE, ONLY AFTER THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL PROVIDES THE PROOF OF RESIDENCE FOR THAT STUDENT REQUIRED IN THIS PARAGRAPH.(1.6) IF A PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF A RETURNING STUDENT HAS NOT SUBMITTED THE NOTIFICATION FORM AND PROOF OF RESIDENCE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1.2) TO THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL BY NOVEMBER 15, THE FOLLOWING APPLY:(I) A CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL MAY COMPLETE AN ALTERNATE NOTIFICATION FORM DEVELOPED BY THE DEPARTMENT. THE ALTERNATE NOTIFICATION FORM SHALL CONTAIN INFORMATION INCLUDING THE SCHOOL DISTRICT OF RESIDENCE BILLED IN THE PRIOR YEAR FOR THE STUDENT, IF KNOWN, AND ANY ADDITIONAL PROOF OF THE STUDENT'S SCHOOL DISTRICT OF RESIDENCE.(II) THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL SUBMIT THE ALTERNATE NOTIFICATION FORM TO THE SCHOOL DISTRICT OF RESIDENCE WITH NO LESS THAN FIVE FORMS OF EVIDENCE SHOWING ATTEMPTS BY THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL TO CONTACT THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN TO SUBMIT THE NOTIFICATION FORM AND PROOF OF RESIDENCE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1.2), INCLUDING 20250HB1505PN3764 - 62 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AT LEAST ONE ATTEMPT THROUGH CERTIFIED MAIL.(III) IF A SCHOOL DISTRICT DOES NOT AGREE THAT A STUDENT IS A RESIDENT OF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT, THE SCHOOL DISTRICT MAY UTILIZE THE PROCESS UNDER PARAGRAPH (2).(2) IF A SCHOOL DISTRICT DETERMINES AT ANY TIME THAT A STUDENT IS NOT A RESIDENT OF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT, THE FOLLOWING APPLY:(I) [WITHIN 10 DAYS OF RECEIPT OF THE NOTICE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1), THE] THE SCHOOL DISTRICT SHALL NOTIFY THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL AND THE DEPARTMENT THAT THE STUDENT IS NOT A RESIDENT OF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT. NOTIFICATION OF NONRESIDENCE SHALL INCLUDE THE BASIS FOR THE DETERMINATION OF NONRESIDENCY.(II) WITHIN 10 DAYS OF NOTIFICATION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I), THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL REVIEW THE NOTIFICATION OF NONRESIDENCE AND NOTIFY THE SCHOOL DISTRICT AND THE DEPARTMENT THAT THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL AGREES WITH THE SCHOOL DISTRICT'S DETERMINATION OR DOES NOT AGREE WITH THE SCHOOL DISTRICT'S DETERMINATION. IF THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL DISAGREES WITH THE SCHOOL DISTRICT'S DETERMINATION, THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL PROVIDE PROOF OF RESIDENCY AS THE BASIS OF THE DETERMINATION TO BOTH THE SCHOOL DISTRICT AND THE DEPARTMENT. IF THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL AGREES THAT THE STUDENT IS NOT A RESIDENT OF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT, THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL DETERMINE THE PROPER SCHOOL DISTRICT OF RESIDENCE FOR THE STUDENT AND REQUEST FUNDS FROM THAT SCHOOL DISTRICT.(III) WITHIN 10 DAYS OF RECEIPT OF THE RESPONSE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II), THE SCHOOL DISTRICT SHALL NOTIFY 20250HB1505PN3764 - 63 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL THAT IT AGREES WITH THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL'S DETERMINATION OR DOES NOT AGREE WITH THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL'S DETERMINATION.(IV) A SCHOOL DISTRICT THAT HAS NOTIFIED THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL THAT IT DOES NOT AGREE WITH THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL'S DETERMINATION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (III) SHALL APPEAL TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR A FINAL DETERMINATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH 2 PA.C.S. CH. 5 SUBCH. A (RELATING TO PRACTICE AND PROCEDURE OF COMMONWEALTH AGENCIES).(V) ALL DECISIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT REGARDING THE SCHOOL DISTRICT OF RESIDENCE OF A STUDENT SHALL BE SUBJECT TO REVIEW BY THE COMMONWEALTH COURT.(VI) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (1.4), A SCHOOL DISTRICT SHALL CONTINUE TO MAKE PAYMENTS TO A CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL UNDER [SECTION] SECTIONS 1725-A AND 1725.1-A DURING THE TIME IN WHICH THE SCHOOL DISTRICT OF RESIDENCE OF A STUDENT IS IN DISPUTE.(VII) IF A FINAL DETERMINATION IS MADE THAT A STUDENT IS NOT A RESIDENT OF AN APPEALING SCHOOL DISTRICT, THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL RETURN ALL FUNDS PROVIDED ON BEHALF OF THAT STUDENT DURING THE PERIOD FOR WHICH THE STUDENT IS NOT A RESIDENT OF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT TO THE SCHOOL DISTRICT WITHIN 30 DAYS.* * *(B) NOTIFICATION [FORM] FORMS.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP [A] NOTIFICATION [FORM] FORMS, WHICH MAY BE ELECTRONIC, FOR USE UNDER SUBSECTION (A). THE [NOTIFICATION] NOTIFICATIONS SHALL INCLUDE:(1) THE FULL NAME, HOME ADDRESS AND MAILING ADDRESS OF THE STUDENT.20250HB1505PN3764 - 64 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *SECTION 1748.1-A. ENROLLEE WELLNESS CHECKS.(A) REQUIREMENTS.--A CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL, AT LEAST ONCE DURING ANY WEEK CONSISTING OF AT LEAST THREE FULL OR PARTIAL DAYS OF ACADEMIC INSTRUCTION, CONDUCT WELLNESS CHECKS TO ENSURE THAT EACH ENROLLED STUDENT IS VISIBLY SEEN AND COMMUNICATED WITH IN REAL TIME EITHER IN PERSON OR VIA ELECTRONIC MEANS BY A TEACHER, ADMINISTRATOR OR OTHER REPRESENTATIVE OF THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL[, EITHER IN PERSON OR VIA ELECTRONIC MEANS,] SUBJECT TO 23 PA.C.S. CH. 63 (RELATING TO CHILD PROTECTIVE SERVICES) IN ORDER TO ENSURE THE WELL-BEING OF THE STUDENT AND VERIFY PARTICIPATION IN THE EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM. [THE REQUIREMENT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE SATISFIED BY STUDENTS TURNING ON A WEBCAM DURING SYNCHRONOUS ONLINE INSTRUCTION.] THE FOLLOWING APPLY TO A WELLNESS CHECK:(1) THE REQUIREMENT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE SATISFIED BY EACH STUDENT TURNING ON A WEBCAM AND A TEACHER, ADMINISTRATOR OR OTHER REPRESENTATIVE OF THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SUBJECT TO 23 PA.C.S. CH. 63 VISIBLY SEEING AND COMMUNICATING WITH THE STUDENT DURING SYNCHRONOUS ONLINE INSTRUCTION.(2) PARTICIPATION IN VIRTUAL OR FACE-TO-FACE HEALTH SCREENINGS, STANDARDIZED TESTING, ADVISING AND TUTORING AND IN-PERSON SCHOOL-SPONSORED ACTIVITIES CHAPERONED BY A TEACHER, ADMINISTRATOR OR OTHER REPRESENTATIVE OF THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SUBJECT TO 23 PA.C.S. CH. 63 MAY COUNT TOWARD FULFILLING A WEEKLY WELLNESS CHECK UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.(3) THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL MAY EXEMPT A STUDENT FROM A WEEKLY WELLNESS CHECK IF THE STUDENT HAS RECEIVED AN EXCUSED ABSENCE FOR THE DAY ON WHICH THE WELLNESS CHECK WAS 20250HB1505PN3764 - 65 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ATTEMPTED, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 1329. IF A STUDENT HAS AN EXCUSED ABSENCE ON THE DAY A WEEKLY WELLNESS CHECK IS ATTEMPTED, THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL CONDUCT THE CHECK ON THE NEXT SCHOOL DAY OR ON ANOTHER SCHOOL DAY DURING THAT SAME WEEK. IF A STUDENT HAS AN EXCUSED ABSENCE FOR ALL SCHOOL DAYS DURING A WEEK, THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL EXEMPT A STUDENT FROM A WELLNESS CHECK FOR THAT WEEK.(4) THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL MAY EXEMPT A STUDENT FROM A WEEKLY WELLNESS CHECK IF THE STUDENT'S HOUSEHOLD IS EXPERIENCING A DOCUMENTED INTERNET OR POWER OUTAGE DURING THE DAY AND TIME IN WHICH THE WELLNESS CHECK WAS ATTEMPTED. THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL CONDUCT THE WELLNESS CHECK ON THE NEXT SCHOOL DAY OR ON ANOTHER SCHOOL DAY DURING THAT SAME WEEK FOLLOWING RESOLUTION OF THE INTERNET OR POWER OUTAGE. THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF THE STUDENT SHALL PROVIDE DOCUMENTATION OF THE INTERNET OR POWER OUTAGE TO THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL AS SOON AS POSSIBLE.(5) WITHIN ONE SCHOOL DAY AFTER A STUDENT FAILS TO COMPLETE A REQUIRED WELLNESS CHECK, THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL:(I) MAKE DOCUMENTED ONGOING EFFORTS TO COMPLETE THE REQUIRED WELLNESS CHECK AND CONTACT THE STUDENT'S PARENT OR GUARDIAN USING AT LEAST TWO DIFFERENT METHODS OF COMMUNICATION; AND(II) PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE STUDENT'S PARENT OR GUARDIAN, IN THEIR PREFERRED LANGUAGE, THAT THE REQUIRED WELLNESS CHECK HAS NOT BEEN COMPLETED.(6) IF THE REQUIRED WELLNESS CHECK IS NOT COMPLETED WITHIN THREE SCHOOL DAYS AFTER THE NOTICE IS SENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (5)(II), THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:20250HB1505PN3764 - 66 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (I) THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL IMMEDIATELY SCHEDULE A WELLNESS REVIEW CONFERENCE TO OCCUR WITHIN ONE SCHOOL DAY. THE CONFERENCE MAY BE CONDUCTED IN PERSON OR BY ELECTRONIC MEANS AND SHALL BE FOR THE PURPOSE OF COMPLETING THE REQUIRED WELLNESS CHECK THROUGH A REAL-TIME VISUAL INTERACTION WITH THE STUDENT, REESTABLISHING COMMUNICATION WITH THE STUDENT AND THE STUDENT'S PARENT OR GUARDIAN, AND IDENTIFYING INTERVENTIONS TO ENSURE THAT THE STUDENT PARTICIPATES IN FUTURE WELLNESS CHECKS.(II) THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL CONVENE THE WELLNESS REVIEW CONFERENCE AS SCHEDULED, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE STUDENT OR THE STUDENT'S PARENT OR GUARDIAN PARTICIPATES.(7) IF A STUDENT DOES NOT PARTICIPATE IN THE WELLNESS REVIEW CONFERENCE IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (6)(II), THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL CONDUCT AN IN-PERSON WELLNESS CHECK WITHIN 24 HOURS OF THE SCHEDULED CONFERENCE.(8) A CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL ADMINISTRATOR MAY NOT ALTER ANY ATTENDANCE RECORD FOR WELLNESS CHECKS AFTER THE WELLNESS CHECK IS PERFORMED, UNLESS THE ALTERATION CORRECTS AN ERROR.(B) REPORT.--IF ANY INDICATION OF ABUSE, NEGLECT OR HARM TO A CHILD IS OBSERVED, THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL ADMINISTRATOR, EMPLOYEE OR REPRESENTATIVE SHALL REPORT THE CONCERNS IN ACCORDANCE WITH 23 PA.C.S. CH. 63 [(RELATING TO CHILD PROTECTIVE SERVICES)].(C) WELLNESS POLICY.--[EACH] NO LATER THAN MARCH 1 OF EACH YEAR FOR THE FOLLOWING SCHOOL YEAR, EACH CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR APPROVAL A WELLNESS CHECK POLICY THAT DEMONSTRATES COMPLIANCE WITH SUBSECTIONS (A) AND (B). ONCE APPROVED, EACH CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL POST THE 20250HB1505PN3764 - 67 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 WELLNESS CHECK POLICY ON ITS PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE.* * *(E) NONCOMPLIANCE.--FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH THIS SECTION MAY RESULT IN THE DEPARTMENT TAKING THE FOLLOWING ACTIONS:* * *(4) PROHIBITING A CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL FROM BEING AWARDED A STATE GRANT BY THE DEPARTMENT UNTIL THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL DEMONSTRATES COMPLIANCE WITH SUBSECTIONS (A) [AND (B)], (B) AND (C).SECTION 35. SECTION 1703-D(B) OF THE ACT IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 1703-D. PILOT PROGRAM.* * *(B) OPERATION.--THE PILOT PROGRAM SHALL OPERATE FOR [THREE] FIVE FULL SCHOOL YEARS, BEGINNING WITH THE 2023-2024 SCHOOL YEAR.* * *SECTION 36. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 1859. TEMPORARY WAIVER.--(A) NOTWITHSTANDING 22 PA. CODE § 339.22 (A)(9)(II)(C) (RELATING TO PROGRAM CONTENT), THE SECRETARY SHALL WAIVE THE REQUIREMENT THAT CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS MUST CONCLUDE IN TWELFTH GRADE.(B) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS FROM CONCLUDING IN TWELFTH GRADE, BUT THE LAST YEAR OF THE PROGRAM SHALL CONCLUDE NO LATER THAN TWELFTH GRADE.(C) THE SECRETARY'S AUTHORITY UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL EXPIRE THREE YEARS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION OR UPON PROMULGATION OF FINAL REGULATIONS, WHICHEVER OCCURS FIRST. THE EXPIRATION OF AUTHORITY UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL 20250HB1505PN3764 - 68 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 NOT AFFECT STUDENTS ENROLLED IN CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS PRIOR TO THE EXPIRATION DATE.(D) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS" SHALL MEAN VOCATIONAL OR TECHNICAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS AS SPECIFIED IN 22 PA. CODE § 339.2 (RELATING TO OPERATION)."SECRETARY" SHALL MEAN THE SECRETARY OF EDUCATION OF THE COMMONWEALTH.SECTION 37. SECTION 1913-A(B)(1.6) OF THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBCLAUSE TO READ:SECTION 1913-A. FINANCIAL PROGRAM; REIMBURSEMENT OF PAYMENTS.--* * *(B) * * *(1.6) FOR THE 2006-2007 FISCAL YEAR AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE PAYMENT FOR A COMMUNITY COLLEGE SHALL CONSIST OF THE FOLLOWING:* * *(XXII) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027, EACH COMMUNITY COLLEGE SHALL RECEIVE AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE FOLLOWING:(A) AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE REIMBURSEMENT FOR OPERATING COSTS RECEIVED IN FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 UNDER SUBCLAUSE (XXI)(A).(B) AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT STIPEND RECEIVED IN FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 UNDER SUBCLAUSE (XXI)(B).* * *SECTION 38. SECTION 1908-B OF THE ACT IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 1908-B. INDIVIDUALS ELIGIBLE FOR ADMISSION; CERTIFICATES AND DEGREES.--(A) THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES SHALL PROVIDE A PROGRAM OF EDUCATION HEREINAFTER DEFINED FOR THOSE 20250HB1505PN3764 - 69 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PERSONS ADMITTED TO THE INSTITUTION PURSUANT TO SECTION 1904-B. IN CONSIDERING SUCH ADMISSION, NO PREFERENCE SHALL BE SHOWN ON ACCOUNT OF RACE, COLOR, SEX, MARITAL STATUS, ETHNIC GROUP OR RELIGION.(B) THE COURSE OF INSTRUCTION SHALL BE THE EQUIVALENT LEVEL OF A TWO-YEAR POSTSECONDARY INSTITUTION WHICH SHALL INCLUDE CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION OF NO MORE THAN TWO YEARS LEADING TO THE AWARDING OF CERTIFICATES OR ASSOCIATE DEGREES, WHEN APPROVED BY THE SECRETARY OF EDUCATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH RULES AND REGULATIONS ESTABLISHED BY THE STATE BOARD FOR THIS LEVEL OF EDUCATION, FOR THE PURPOSE OF FITTING PUPILS TO PURSUE EFFECTIVELY A RECOGNIZED PROFITABLE EMPLOYMENT.(C) IN ADDITION TO THE CERTIFICATES AND DEGREES AUTHORIZED UNDER SUBSECTION (B), THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES MAY ESTABLISH AND OFFER COURSES OF INSTRUCTION LEADING TO THE AWARDING OF BACCALAUREATE DEGREES IN APPLIED SCIENCES, INCLUDING THE BACHELOR OF APPLIED SCIENCE, IN FIELDS ALIGNED WITH TECHNICAL EDUCATION, WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT AND HIGH-PRIORITY OCCUPATIONS WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH. THE BACCALAUREATE DEGREE PROGRAMS AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:(1) BUILD UPON OR ARTICULATE WITH ASSOCIATE DEGREE PROGRAMS OFFERED BY THE COLLEGE;(2) EMPHASIZE APPLIED, TECHNICAL AND CAREER-FOCUSED INSTRUCTION DESIGNED TO MEET WORKFORCE NEEDS;(3) INCLUDE APPROPRIATE GENERAL EDUCATION COMPONENTS TO ENSURE ACADEMIC RIGOR CONSISTENT WITH BACCALAUREATE-LEVEL STUDY; AND(4) BE SUBJECT TO APPROVAL BY AN APPLICABLE REGIONAL ACCREDITING AGENCY.(D) THE COLLEGE MAY NOT OFFER GRADUATE-LEVEL DEGREES UNLESS 20250HB1505PN3764 - 70 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SEPARATELY AUTHORIZED BY ACT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.(E) THE COLLEGE SHALL COLLABORATE, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, WITH OTHER PUBLIC INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH TO:(1) AVOID UNNECESSARY DUPLICATION OF PROGRAMS;(2) PROMOTE TRANSFER AND ARTICULATION PATHWAYS; AND(3) ADDRESS STATEWIDE AND REGIONAL WORKFORCE NEEDS.(F) AS PART OF THE ANNUAL REPORT UNDER SECTION 1916-B, THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES SHALL SUBMIT AN ANNUAL REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SUMMARIZING:(1) BACCALAUREATE PROGRAMS OFFERED;(2) ENROLLMENT, COMPLETION AND EMPLOYMENT OUTCOMES; AND(3) ALIGNMENT WITH WORKFORCE DEMAND.(G) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO ALTER THE STATUS OF THE COLLEGE AS A RESIDENTIAL, TWO-YEAR COLLEGE WITH A PRIMARY MISSION OF PROVIDING TECHNICAL EDUCATION. THE OFFERING OF BACCALAUREATE DEGREES IN APPLIED SCIENCES SHALL BE CONSIDERED A SUPPLEMENT TO THE PRIMARY MISSION.SECTION 39. THE DEFINITION OF "APPROVED COURSE OF STUDY" IN SECTION 2001-A OF THE ACT, ADDED JULY 17, 2024 (P.L.945, NO.89), IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 2001-A. DEFINITIONS.--THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS ARTICLE SHALL, FOR THE PURPOSE OF THIS ARTICLE, HAVE THE FOLLOWING MEANINGS, RESPECTIVELY, EXCEPT IN THOSE INSTANCES WHERE THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES A DIFFERENT MEANING:* * *"APPROVED COURSE OF STUDY" SHALL MEAN A PROGRAM OFFERED BY AN INSTITUTION THAT PROVIDES INSTRUCTION IN AGRICULTURE, COMPUTER SCIENCE, BUSINESS, EDUCATION, SPECIAL EDUCATION, STEM EDUCATION, 20250HB1505PN3764 - 71 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ENGINEERING, NURSING, ALLIED HEALTH, CRIMINAL JUSTICE OR OTHER PROGRAMS ALIGNED TO IN-DEMAND OCCUPATIONS PRESCRIBED UNDER THE GROW PENNSYLVANIA SCHOLARSHIP GRANT PROGRAM UNDER ARTICLE XX-L AND APPROVED BY THE AGENCY.* * *SECTION 40. SECTION 2022-A(B)(4) AND (5)(II), (J) AND (M) OF THE ACT, ADDED JULY 17, 2024 (P.L.945, NO.89) AND AMENDED NOVEMBER 12, 2025 (P.L.244, NO.47), ARE AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 2022-A. GROW PENNSYLVANIA TUITION WAIVER PROGRAM.--* * *(B) TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR RECEIPT OF A TUITION WAIVER, AN ELIGIBLE NONRESIDENT STUDENT MUST:* * *(4) NOT HAVE EARNED A BACHELOR'S DEGREE OR MASTER'S DEGREE OR THE EQUIVALENT.(5) ENTER INTO A WRITTEN AGREEMENT WITH THE AGENCY TO:* * *(II) RESIDE AND COMMENCE EMPLOYMENT IN THIS COMMONWEALTH WITHIN ONE YEAR AFTER COMPLETION OF AN APPROVED COURSE OF STUDY CULMINATING IN A BACHELOR'S [OR] DEGREE, ASSOCIATE'S DEGREE OR, IF ENROLLED IN AN ACCELERATED MASTER'S DEGREE PROGRAM, MASTER'S DEGREE. THE EMPLOYMENT MUST BE IN AN IN-DEMAND OCCUPATION, AS DETERMINED BY THE AGENCY, FOR A PERIOD OF TWELVE MONTHS FOR EACH ACADEMIC YEAR THE STUDENT RECEIVED A TUITION WAIVER, UNLESS THE AGENCY DETERMINES THAT THERE ARE EXTENUATING CIRCUMSTANCES. IF THE AGENCY DETERMINES THAT THERE ARE NO EXTENUATING CIRCUMSTANCES, RESIDENCY AND EMPLOYMENT IN THIS COMMONWEALTH MUST BE MAINTAINED FOR THE DURATION OF THE QUALIFYING EMPLOYMENT.* * *20250HB1505PN3764 - 72 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [(J) IN ANY YEAR WHEN FEWER THAN THREE HUNDRED (300) TUITION WAIVERS ARE AWARDED, THE COMMONWEALTH SHALL PAY TO THE SYSTEM IN THE SUBSEQUENT YEAR THE FOLLOWING AMOUNT:(1) SUBTRACT THE NUMBER OF TUITION WAIVERS AWARDED FROM THREE HUNDRED (300).(2) MULTIPLY THE SUM IN PARAGRAPH (1) BY THE DIFFERENTIAL BETWEEN TUITION FOR A RESIDENT AND NONRESIDENT STUDENT.]* * *(M) THE SYSTEM SHALL ACTIVELY ADVERTISE AND MARKET THE PROGRAM AND THE GROW PENNSYLVANIA SCHOLARSHIP GRANT PROGRAM UNDER ARTICLE XX-L TO STUDENTS AND [INCLUDE] PROMINENTLY DISPLAY INFORMATION ABOUT THE PROGRAM ON THE SYSTEM'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE AND ON EACH INSTITUTION'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE.* * *SECTION 41. THE DEFINITION OF "TRADE" IN SECTION 2050-L OF THE ACT, ADDED JULY 17, 2024 (P.L.945, NO.89), IS AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A DEFINITION TO READ:SECTION 2050-L. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS SUBARTICLE SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"ACCELERATED MASTER'S DEGREE PROGRAM." AN ACCELERATED PROGRAM NOT EXCEEDING FIVE ACADEMIC YEARS THAT ENABLES STUDENTS TO EARN A BACHELOR'S DEGREE AND AN ADVANCED DEGREE BY TAKING GRADUATE COURSES WHILE COMPLETING THEIR UNDERGRADUATE DEGREE.* * *"TRADE." A PROGRAM OFFERED BY THE PENNSYLVANIA COLLEGE OF TECHNOLOGY AND THE THADDEUS STEVENS COLLEGE OF TECHNOLOGY[.], OR A PROGRAM OFFERED BY AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION THAT IS 20250HB1505PN3764 - 73 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE SAME CLASSIFICATION OF INSTRUCTIONAL PROGRAM CODE OFFERED BY THE PENNSYLVANIA COLLEGE OF TECHNOLOGY OR THE THADDEUS STEVENS COLLEGE OF TECHNOLOGY.SECTION 42. SECTION 2052-L(4)(IV) AND (V)(B) OF THE ACT, AMENDED NOVEMBER 12, 2025 (P.L.244, NO.47), ARE AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING PARAGRAPHS TO READ:SECTION 2052-L. AGENCY DUTIES.THE AGENCY SHALL:* * *(4) ESTABLISH ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA IN ORDER FOR A STUDENT TO RECEIVE A GRANT. THE CRITERIA SHALL, AT A MINIMUM, INCLUDE THAT A STUDENT MUST:* * *(IV) NOT HAVE EARNED A BACHELOR'S DEGREE OR MASTER'S DEGREE OR THE EQUIVALENT.(V) ENTER INTO A WRITTEN AGREEMENT WITH THE AGENCY TO:* * *(B) RESIDE AND COMMENCE EMPLOYMENT IN THIS COMMONWEALTH WITHIN ONE YEAR AFTER COMPLETION OF AN APPROVED COURSE OF STUDY CULMINATING IN A BACHELOR'S DEGREE, [OR] ASSOCIATE'S DEGREE[.] OR, IF ENROLLED IN AN ACCELERATED MASTER'S DEGREE PROGRAM, MASTER'S DEGREE. THE EMPLOYMENT MUST BE IN AN IN-DEMAND OCCUPATION, AS DETERMINED BY THE AGENCY, FOR A PERIOD OF 12 MONTHS FOR EACH ACADEMIC YEAR THE STUDENT RECEIVED A GRANT, UNLESS THE AGENCY DETERMINES THAT THERE ARE EXTENUATING CIRCUMSTANCES. IF THE AGENCY DETERMINES THAT THERE ARE NO EXTENUATING CIRCUMSTANCES, RESIDENCY AND EMPLOYMENT IN THIS 20250HB1505PN3764 - 74 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 COMMONWEALTH MUST BE MAINTAINED FOR THE DURATION OF THE QUALIFYING EMPLOYMENT.* * *(8) TRANSMIT TO EACH INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION A COMPLETE LIST OF ALL APPROVED OCCUPATIONS BY STANDARD OCCUPATIONAL CLASSIFICATION NO LATER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH AND NO LATER THAN NOVEMBER 30 OF EACH YEAR.(9) REVIEW AND CERTIFY EACH INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION'S LIST OF APPROVED COURSES OF STUDY WITHIN 90 DAYS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH. THE AGENCY SHALL EACH YEAR THEREAFTER REVIEW AND CERTIFY THE LIST PRIOR TO AN APPLICATION PERIOD BEING OPENED.(10) ESTABLISH AN APPEALS PROCESS IN WHICH A STUDENT, WITH THE CONSENT OF THE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION, MAY PETITION THE AGENCY TO DETERMINE THAT THE STUDENT'S COURSE OF STUDY WILL RESULT IN EMPLOYMENT IN AN IN-DEMAND OCCUPATION. THE APPEAL MAY INCLUDE, BUT NOT BE LIMITED TO, A STUDENT ENROLLED IN A GENERAL PROGRAM OF STUDY OR A PRE-MAJOR PROGRAM OF STUDY PROVIDED THAT THE STUDENT AND INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION CERTIFY IN THE APPEAL THAT THE STUDENT IS NOT IN AN UNDECLARED STATUS AND THE STUDENT INTENDS TO ENROLL OR IS ENROLLED IN A PROGRAM OF STUDY THAT MAPS TO AN APPROVED OCCUPATION REQUIRING AN ASSOCIATE'S DEGREE OR BACHELOR'S DEGREE OR AN OCCUPATION RELATED TO AN APPROVED ACCELERATED MASTER'S DEGREE PROGRAM.SECTION 43. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 2052.1-L. INSTITUTION DUTIES.EACH INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL:(1) PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM.20250HB1505PN3764 - 75 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) CERTIFY AN APPLICANT'S ELIGIBILITY AS PRESENTED BY THE AGENCY NOT LATER THAN 30 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE REQUEST.(3) IDENTIFY AND REPORT TO THE AGENCY, IN A MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE AGENCY, ALL COURSES OF STUDY OFFERED BY THE INSTITUTION THAT ARE ELIGIBLE FOR THE PROGRAM, NO LATER THAN 60 DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH AND NO LATER THAN JANUARY 15 OF EACH YEAR THEREAFTER.(4) FOLLOWING CERTIFICATION FROM THE AGENCY, POST ON THE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE ALL APPROVED COURSES OF STUDY UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE THAT ARE OFFERED AT THE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION.(5) POST INFORMATION ABOUT THE PROGRAM ON THE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE.SECTION 44. SECTION 2062-L OF THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING PARAGRAPHS TO READ:SECTION 2062-L. REPORT.THE AGENCY SHALL PREPARE AND SUBMIT TO THE GOVERNOR, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THE SECRETARY OF EDUCATION AN ANNUAL REPORT DETAILING THE OPERATION OF THE PROGRAM EACH YEAR. THE REPORT SHALL, AT A MINIMUM, INCLUDE:* * *(11) THE NUMBER OF APPEALS GRANTED AND DENIED UNDER SECTION 2052-L(10).(12) A LIST OF PROGRAMS OF STUDY GRANTED AND DENIED UNDER SECTION 2052-L(10).SECTION 45. SECTION 2204-B(B)(1) AND (C) OF THE ACT, AMENDED JULY 17, 2024 (P.L.945, NO.89) AND NOVEMBER 12, 2025 (P.L.244, 20250HB1505PN3764 - 76 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 NO.47), ARE AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 2204-B. AGENCY.* * * (B) ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA.--THE ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA DEVELOPED FOR THE RECEIPT OF A SCHOLARSHIP UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL, AT A MINIMUM, REQUIRE ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) TOTAL ANNUAL HOUSEHOLD INCOME NOT TO EXCEED [$200,000] $208,000. WITH EACH NEW AWARD YEAR, THE AGENCY MAY ANNUALLY ADJUST THE TOTAL ANNUAL HOUSEHOLD INCOME THRESHOLD UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH TO REFLECT ANY UPWARD CHANGES IN THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS (CPI-U) FOR THE PENNSYLVANIA, NEW JERSEY, DELAWARE AND MARYLAND AREA.* * *(C) COMBINATION.--A STUDENT MAY BE ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE A SCHOLARSHIP UNDER SUBSECTION (A) IF THE SCHOLARSHIP AWARD IN COMBINATION WITH A STATE GRANT AWARD FOR THE SAME ACADEMIC YEAR DOES NOT EXCEED THE ANNUALLY ESTABLISHED MAXIMUM AMOUNT FOR THE READY-TO-SUCCEED SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM AS ESTABLISHED BY THE AGENCY. BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, THE MAXIMUM SCHOLARSHIP AWARD AMOUNT SHALL NOT BE LESS THAN $3,000.* * *SECTION 46. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 2330. STATE AID FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027.NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF LAW TO THE CONTRARY, EACH LIBRARY SUBJECT TO 24 PA.C.S. CH. 93 (RELATING TO PUBLIC LIBRARY CODE) SHALL BE ELIGIBLE FOR STATE AID FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027 AS FOLLOWS:(1) FUNDS APPROPRIATED FOR LIBRARIES SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO EACH LIBRARY UNDER THE FOLLOWING FORMULA:(I) DIVIDE THE SUM OF THE AMOUNT OF FUNDING THE 20250HB1505PN3764 - 77 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 LIBRARY RECEIVED IN FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 UNDER SECTION 2329 BY THE TOTAL STATE-AID SUBSIDY FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026.(II) MULTIPLY THE QUOTIENT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) BY THE TOTAL STATE-AID SUBSIDY FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027.(2) FOLLOWING DISTRIBUTION OF FUNDS APPROPRIATED FOR STATE AID TO LIBRARIES UNDER PARAGRAPH (1), ANY REMAINING FUNDS MAY BE DISTRIBUTED AT THE DISCRETION OF THE STATE LIBRARIAN.(3) IF FUNDS APPROPRIATED FOR STATE AID TO LIBRARIES IN FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027 ARE LESS THAN FUNDS APPROPRIATED IN FISCAL YEAR 2002-2003, ADJUSTED FOR INFLATION ACCORDING TO THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX, THE STATE LIBRARIAN MAY WAIVE STANDARDS AS PRESCRIBED IN 24 PA.C.S. CH. 93.(4) EACH LIBRARY SYSTEM RECEIVING STATE AID UNDER THIS SECTION MAY DISTRIBUTE THE LOCAL LIBRARY SHARE OF THAT AID IN A MANNER AS DETERMINED BY THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE LIBRARY SYSTEM.(5) IN THE CASE OF A LIBRARY SYSTEM THAT CONTAINS A LIBRARY OPERATING IN A CITY OF THE SECOND CLASS, CHANGES TO THE DISTRIBUTION OF STATE AID TO THE LIBRARY SHALL BE MADE BY MUTUAL AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE LIBRARY AND THE LIBRARY SYSTEM.(6) IN THE EVENT OF A CHANGE IN DISTRICT LIBRARY CENTER POPULATION PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH AS A RESULT OF:(I) A CITY, BOROUGH, TOWN, TOWNSHIP, SCHOOL DISTRICT OR COUNTY MOVING FROM ONE LIBRARY CENTER TO ANOTHER; OR(II) A TRANSFER OF DISTRICT LIBRARY CENTER STATUS TO A COUNTY LIBRARY SYSTEM; FUNDING OF DISTRICT LIBRARY CENTER AID SHALL BE PAID BASED ON THE POPULATION OF THE 20250HB1505PN3764 - 78 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 NEWLY ESTABLISHED OR RECONFIGURED DISTRICT LIBRARY CENTER.(7) IN THE EVENT OF A CHANGE IN DIRECT SERVICE AREA FROM ONE LIBRARY TO ANOTHER, THE STATE LIBRARIAN, UPON AGREEMENT OF THE AFFECTED LIBRARIES, MAY REDISTRIBUTE THE LOCAL LIBRARY SHARE OF AID TO THE LIBRARY CURRENTLY SERVICING THE AREA.SECTION 47. SECTIONS 2502.56 AND 2509.8 OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED BY ADDING SUBSECTIONS TO READ:SECTION 2502.56. STUDENT-WEIGHTED BASIC EDUCATION FUNDING BEGINNING WITH 2023-2024 SCHOOL YEAR.--* * *(C.2) FOR THE 2025-2026 SCHOOL YEAR, THE COMMONWEALTH SHALL MAKE SUPPLEMENTAL BASIC EDUCATION FUNDING PAYMENTS. SUPPLEMENTAL PAYMENTS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE DEEMED TO BE PART OF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT'S ALLOCATION AMOUNT UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1) FOR THE IMMEDIATELY SUCCEEDING SCHOOL YEAR AND EACH SCHOOL YEAR THEREAFTER. THE SUPPLEMENTAL PAYMENTS SHALL BE MADE AS FOLLOWS:(1) TWO MILLION FIVE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS ($2,500,000) TO A SCHOOL DISTRICT LOCATED IN A COUNTY OF THE THIRD CLASS WITH A 2021-2022 ADJUSTED AVERAGE DAILY MEMBERSHIP GREATER THAN 4,205 AND LESS THAN 4,210 AND A 2021-2022 CURRENT EXPENDITURE OF LESS THAN SIXTY-TWO MILLION DOLLARS ($62,000,000).(2) ONE MILLION DOLLARS ($1,000,000) TO A SCHOOL DISTRICT LOCATED IN A COUNTY OF THE THIRD CLASS WITH A 2021-2022 ADJUSTED AVERAGE DAILY MEMBERSHIP GREATER THAN 4,530 AND LESS THAN 4,540 AND A 2021-2022 CURRENT EXPENDITURE OF GREATER THAN SEVENTY-EIGHT MILLION DOLLARS ($78,000,000).(3) THREE MILLION FIVE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS ($3,500,000) TO A SCHOOL DISTRICT LOCATED IN A COUNTY OF THE SECOND CLASS A WITH A 2021-2022 ADJUSTED AVERAGE DAILY MEMBERSHIP GREATER THAN 960 AND LESS THAN 965 AND A 2021-2022 CURRENT EXPENDITURE OF 20250HB1505PN3764 - 79 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 GREATER THAN TWENTY-THREE MILLION DOLLARS ($23,000,000).(4) ONE MILLION DOLLARS ($1,000,000) TO A SCHOOL DISTRICT LOCATED IN A COUNTY OF THE THIRD CLASS WITH A 2021-2022 ADJUSTED AVERAGE DAILY MEMBERSHIP GREATER THAN 1,615 AND LESS THAN 1,620 AND A 2021-2022 CURRENT EXPENDITURE OF LESS THAN TWENTY-NINE MILLION FIVE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS ($29,500,000).* * *SECTION 2509.8. EXTRAORDINARY SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAM EXPENSES.--* * *(H) FOR THE 2026-2027 SCHOOL YEAR AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO FIVE MILLION DOLLARS ($5,000,000) FROM THE SPECIAL EDUCATION APPROPRIATION SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO CHARTER SCHOOLS ESTABLISHED UNDER SECTION 1717-A IN A SCHOOL DISTRICT OF THE FIRST CLASS FOR EXTRAORDINARY EXPENSES INCURRED IN PROVIDING A SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAM OR SERVICE TO ONE OR MORE STUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES AS APPROVED BY THE SECRETARY OF EDUCATION. THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(1) THE EXTRAORDINARY EXPENSES SHALL BE CALCULATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 1372(8)(VI).(2) SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (F)(II) AND (III) SHALL APPLY TO MONEY DISTRIBUTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.(3) THE AMOUNT ALLOCATED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL NOT BE INCLUDED WHEN CALCULATING THE AMOUNTS UNDER SUBSECTION (F)(I) AND SECTION 2509.1(C.2).SECTION 48. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 2509.18. TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.--FOR THE 2026-2027 FISCAL YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION MAY USE FUNDS NOT EXPENDED, ENCUMBERED OR COMMITTED FROM THE APPROPRIATION FOR TUITION FOR ORPHANS AND CHILDREN PLACED IN PRIVATE HOMES FOR A PROGRAM TO ASSIST RESIDENTIAL, PRIVATE ACADEMIC SCHOOLS LICENSED 20250HB1505PN3764 - 80 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 UNDER THE ACT OF JANUARY 28, 1988 (P.L.24, NO.11), KNOWN AS THE PRIVATE ACADEMIC SCHOOLS ACT, WITH TUITION COSTS IF A STUDENT IS PLACED IN THE SCHOOL BY A COURT OR AGENCY AND A SCHOOL DISTRICT OF RESIDENCE WAS UNABLE TO BE DETERMINED FOR THE 2025-2026 SCHOOL YEAR. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AN APPLICATION PROCESS FOR THIS PROGRAM AND SHALL REQUIRE THE RESIDENTIAL, PRIVATE ACADEMIC LICENSED SCHOOL TO PROVIDE DOCUMENTED PROOF OF ATTEMPTS TO IDENTIFY A STUDENT'S SCHOOL DISTRICT OF RESIDENCE.SECTION 49. SECTION 2510.3(A)(2) OF THE ACT, AMENDED NOVEMBER 12, 2025 (P.L.244, NO.47), IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 2510.3. ASSISTANCE TO SCHOOL DISTRICTS DECLARED TO BE IN FINANCIAL RECOVERY STATUS OR IDENTIFIED FOR FINANCIAL WATCH STATUS.--(A) THE FOLLOWING APPLY:* * *(2) FOR THE 2017-2018, 2018-2019, 2019-2020, 2020-2021, 2021-2022, 2022-2023, 2023-2024, 2024-2025 [AND], 2025-2026 AND 2026-2027 FISCAL YEARS, THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION MAY UTILIZE UP TO SEVEN MILLION DOLLARS ($7,000,000) OF UNDISTRIBUTED FUNDS NOT EXPENDED, ENCUMBERED OR COMMITTED FROM APPROPRIATIONS FOR GRANTS, SUBSIDIES AND ASSESSMENTS MADE TO THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION TO ASSIST SCHOOL DISTRICTS DECLARED TO BE IN FINANCIAL RECOVERY STATUS UNDER SECTION 621-A, IDENTIFIED FOR FINANCIAL WATCH STATUS UNDER SECTION 611-A OR 694-A OR SUBJECT TO OVERSIGHT DURING THE TRANSITION PERIOD UNDER SECTION 625-A. THE FUNDS SHALL BE TRANSFERRED BY THE SECRETARY OF THE BUDGET TO A RESTRICTED ACCOUNT AS NECESSARY TO MAKE PAYMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION AND, WHEN TRANSFERRED, ARE HEREBY APPROPRIATED TO CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.* * *SECTION 50. SECTION 2599.6(A.8) AND (A.9)(2) OF THE ACT, 20250HB1505PN3764 - 81 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AMENDED OR ADDED NOVEMBER 12, 2025 (P.L.244, NO.47), ARE AMENDED AND SUBSECTIONS (A.6) AND (A.7) ARE AMENDED BY ADDING PARAGRAPHS TO READ:SECTION 2599.6. READY-TO-LEARN BLOCK GRANT.--* * *(A.6) THE COMMONWEALTH SHALL PAY AN ADEQUACY SUPPLEMENT FROM THE READY-TO-LEARN BLOCK GRANT APPROPRIATION AS FOLLOWS:* * *(3) FOR THE 2026-2027 SCHOOL YEAR:(I) DIVIDE THE AMOUNT DETERMINED IN SUBSECTION (F)(1) BY THE SUM OF THE AMOUNTS DETERMINED IN SUBSECTION (F)(1) FOR EACH SCHOOL DISTRICT.(II) MULTIPLY THE QUOTIENT DETERMINED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) BY $526,440,000.(A.7) THE COMMONWEALTH SHALL PAY A TAX EQUITY SUPPLEMENT FROM THE READY-TO-LEARN BLOCK GRANT APPROPRIATION AS FOLLOWS:* * *(3) FOR THE 2026-2027 SCHOOL YEAR:(I) DIVIDE THE AMOUNT DETERMINED IN SUBSECTION (G)(1) BY THE SUM OF THE AMOUNTS DETERMINED IN SUBSECTION (G)(1) FOR EACH SCHOOL DISTRICT.(II) MULTIPLY THE QUOTIENT DETERMINED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) BY $32,202,000.(A.8) NO SCHOOL DISTRICT THAT RECEIVES FUNDING UNDER SUBSECTION (A.6) OR (A.7) SHALL SEEK A REFERENDUM EXCEPTION UNDER SECTION 333 OF THE ACT OF JUNE 27, 2006 (1ST SP.SESS., P.L.1873, NO.1), KNOWN AS THE TAXPAYER RELIEF ACT, FOR THE 2025-2026 [AND], 2026-2027 AND 2027-2028 SCHOOL YEARS. A SCHOOL DISTRICT IS NOT REQUIRED TO APPLY FOR AND RECEIVE THE FUNDING UNDER SUBSECTION (A.6) OR (A.7) FOR WHICH IT IS ELIGIBLE.(A.9) THE COMMONWEALTH SHALL PAY A MINIMUM ALLOCATION 20250HB1505PN3764 - 82 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SUPPLEMENT, FOR WHICH THE PROVISIONS UNDER SUBSECTIONS (B)(1), (C)(3) AND (D)(2) SHALL APPLY, FROM THE READY-TO-LEARN BLOCK GRANT APPROPRIATION AS FOLLOWS:* * *(2) [(RESERVED)] FOR THE 2026-2027 SCHOOL YEAR:(I) IF THE SUM OF THE AMOUNTS DETERMINED UNDER SUBSECTIONS (A.6)(3)(II) AND (A.7)(3)(II) FOR THE SCHOOL DISTRICT IS LESS THAN $50,000, THE DIFFERENCE OF $50,000 MINUS THE SUM OF THE AMOUNTS DETERMINED UNDER SUBSECTIONS (A.6)(3)(II) AND (A.7)(3)(II) FOR THE SCHOOL DISTRICT.(II) IF THE SUM OF THE AMOUNTS DETERMINED UNDER SUBSECTIONS (A.6)(3)(II) AND (A.7)(3)(II) FOR THE SCHOOL DISTRICT IS GREATER THAN OR EQUAL TO $50,000, $0.* * *SECTION 51. SECTION 2608-J OF THE ACT, AMENDED NOVEMBER 12, 2025 (P.L.244, NO.47), IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 2608-J. APPLICABILITY.THIS ARTICLE SHALL APPLY TO PROJECTS FOR WHICH APPROVAL AND REIMBURSEMENT IS SOUGHT AND TO THE MAINTENANCE PROJECT GRANT PROGRAM BEGINNING [JULY 1, 2026.] THE FIRST FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH MONEY IS SPECIFICALLY APPROPRIATED FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE.SECTION 52. THE ADDITION OF SECTION 1218.2 OF THE ACT SHALL APPLY RETROACTIVELY TO JULY 1, 2026.SECTION 53. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE AMENDMENT OR ADDITION OF SECTION 1205.2(C)(9) AND (H.1) OF THE ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 180 DAYS.(2) THE FOLLOWING SHALL TAKE EFFECT JULY 1, 2027:THE AMENDMENT OF SECTION 1205.2(O) OF THE ACT.THE AMENDMENT OF SECTION 1205.5(A)(1) AND (G) OF THE 20250HB1505PN3764 - 83 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ACT.THE AMENDMENT OF SECTION 1217(C) OF THE ACT.THE ADDITION OF SECTION 1512.2 OF THE ACT.(3) THE AMENDMENT OR ADDITION OF SECTION 1333(A) AND (C.2)(1) AND (2) OF THE ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 90 DAYS.(4) THE REMAINDER OF THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.20250HB1505PN3764 - 84 - 1234567